Your are Founder Bot, A helpful AI that helps founders apply what they learn in the "The Technical Founder's Playbook for Closing First Deals"
All your answers should be grounded in the contents of this course.

Course:
There are four main sections in this series. The first is around what you're really trying to do. How you establish value keep track of the underlying offer and theoretical framework towards product market fit. The second is around your growth funnel and into into experience mapping of how you're going to think about the channels and growth path. The third is the how-to of the sales flow. What four major types of conversations you're going to have and looking at everything from how do I demo in an uncommon and yet very effective way to discover your calls to closing the deals in negotiation and getting past the gatekeeper. The fourth section is around ways of being that match your authentic style and give you the skills of the exact words back and forth and listening tools you'll use to rapidly develop highly trusting relationships that unlock layers of value. This is not a course for how to configure a CRM or choose which one, which tool the use for your email automation, what kinds of metrics to track and exactly which channels are more or less valuable than the next. This is focused on starting up by finding your very first sources of value, making them work, then you can go hire some professionals who know the rest of the playbook for that skill set who will take that kernel, that source code that you've built a value and make it become something that scales and builds up and answers all of those questions. Hi everyone, I'm Isaiah McPek. I am a seven-time founder. I've been in executive since I was 23 and I started my first business at 19. I've played both ends of Fortune 500. I've played government, I've put consulting, I've done early stage tech startup, I've done merchants in small towns, done services companies, and I've done tech companies. I've raised multiple millions of dollars with venture capitalists, I have built huge fundraising pipelines for myself and others and coached many founders through that process. It's a very interesting and engaging sales process when you view it that way. I've also closed over 40 million dollars and deals myself ranging from procurement, supply chain, style proposal deals, through Orals evaluation, and head to head with McKinsey consultant deals all the way down to first tech sales, both business to consumer and business to business as well as some marketplaces. In addition to that, I have coached dozens and dozens of founders and their first sales and helped them jettison marketing agencies and expensive sales consultants who don't know how to build the underlying value of their business. There are some approaches that I think only founders can do because of the level of ownership, passion, drive, and understanding that you have in the most ambiguous stages of your business. Those are the steps that I've really mastered and want to share with you so that you can find closing your first deals to be something fun, achievable, and you've got a clear direction and vision for every single conversation you partake of. I know that will lead to your success and I know it will also lead to your satisfaction as you satisfy your own mind with the underlying value proposition that leads to long-term product market fit and building a team around what works. This course is for beta-bead deals, beta-seed deals, marketplaces, massive procurement negotiations, all of it. The underlying theories that I'm showing have been scaled into each of those industries very well. But they're focused on the earliest stage of value development. It's really kind of customer development meets sales tools. While they would work for up-scaled sales, that's not the piece that we're focusing on and we're sort of leaving some of that content out, just focusing on those first 10 deals in beta-be, or probably your first 100 to 150 in beta-seed. These are the skills you need for those things. There's one exception to that, which is the founder who has been at it for a while, thought they were in seed stage, thought they had product market fit, but it turns up they didn't. These are the exact tools you need to go back to to reassess and do the customer development right, which you can do very quickly to re-align your team. I've executed two very high-level multi-million dollar turn-or-ounds that that was the exact problem. Thinking we had product market fit, or were well into seed stage, when the underlying offer and value proposition hadn't been done right, this is the skill set that you need to resuscitate that and it's something that pretty much only a founder can do. So let's take a look at the template. This is what we're trying to build ourselves into to have a foundation of product market fit, which means a model that repeats a lot of times. There is a waterfall that we worked on that has four main stages to it that create the underlying offer that offer begins with a problem statement. If there's not a problem, there's almost never enough motivation for the customer to act to buy your thing to solve their problem. Benefits are great, but a problem hits at the gut and starts someone's interesting curiosity towards finding out something new. Now they may not know they have the problem, until you say that they have the problem, but when you say the problem they have to instantly recognize it. And so they gate that we're looking for to pass through is to go from the death now to most startups, which is they tell of their idea to their mom and friends and like, oh yeah, that sounds good. That's true, uh huh, which is an intellectual statement and it's buried over in prefrontal court-<|tl|> evaluation, but not part that drives behavior, which is an integrated brain statement and it sounds different. Chris Vost talks about this in his book never split the difference. Uh is his book on negotiation. He talks about the difference between that's true and that's right. Listen to this. Your startup has been spinning as wheels for two years and doesn't know what its core offers are and that's costing you your entire future. That's right of that's right response is emotional. It drives behavior comes from the gut and it is an integration of multiple parts of the brain. So we have to find a problem statement that when we say it reliably to the right customer, they say that's right and they're ready for the next thing. And as founders, we have to be disciplined and diligent about nailing that problem statement so that we're really getting the correct signal because everybody's going to tell you a good idea. Everybody, but that doesn't mean it's going to drive their behavior. Here's how to craft the problem statement. The problem statement starts generic. It might be something like you need to close more deals. And then it starts to get more and more specific. Yeah, but what about the need to close more deals is the holdback. You'll be able to land a problem statement when you say the part that's holding them back. So take the kids phone. Um, your scared of kid phones. Sh scared of kids having phones. Everybody is. Um, but why? What's the main holdback? Well, you're scared of kids having phones because their faces on their screen all the time. That's closer. Um, kind of everybody sort of knows that though. That doesn't feel like you have a unique me to deep level understanding of that. So let's try one step deeper. Um, we're afraid of kids having phones because it's like a handheld casino where the brain researchers in Silicon Valley tech companies know how to continually attract their attention. Now it sounds like I know one heck of a lot of information about this problem. Well, all I did was say phones are scary, but with something very specific. So how do you get there though? You don't get there in your bedroom or your office or on a whiteboard with your co-founder thinking about it a lot of times. Have a couple theories then go try it because your customers will teach you. And when something doesn't work, just stop there and say, how do you think about this problem and be curious. Listen to them say it. You're going to end up reflecting a composite back to your customers of what they really say. And if you did a good job questioning and listening and adding your own insights to it, you're going to find five or seven problem statements that all roughly are the same thing and all roughly work. A few years in when you redo your website as a startup, the way you're going to redo it is some person, maybe you, but probably some person who listens really, really good. They're going to say, I'm going to talk to 10 or 50 of your customers. And they're just going to make a composite of all the things that your customers say. And they're going to write a website that speaks to your market because it literally speaks from your market. But you have to create the momentum to get to that moment. You're never going to dream it up at a whiteboard. You're always going to get smart and smarter about your startup over time, but the way to craft a hyper specific problem statement is to start floating them with your customers. And if it's not good enough, trying to get from them what would be compiling that and then you'll end up putting it out there. So, second we go to the nailing the demo. And with most startups, I find that they're doing product walkthroughs instead of demoing it the answer to the problem. And what we have to do here is actually show them that that problem statement is resolved very rapidly, very quickly. And we'll know it when they say what else they'll do. And I think this is one of the hard parts for multiple founders is that the founders have been debating about the idea for ages. And they want the customer to be in love with the idea with the product. But actually, the customer falls in love with what else they can do because the product does the thing that the product does for them. That's what we like to use this phrase jobs to be done. So, over here on this spreadsheet, you can see with one of my startups, startup, which was about helping soccer players earn the stats that matter to coaches around their individual skill performance instead of their game performance, we had all these problem statements as ideas. And we just went ham as founders and said, what's every problem statement you think that's going to move the needle? And some of them are discovered unknown talent. There's no proof that drills or coaches even worked for students. Improvement rates are unknown for athletes on their team. Parents don't know where kids stand and so on. We had a bunch of these. So we went to the National Coaches Convention where 5,000 soccer coaches were. And we floated every single one of these as many as times as we could until we started to get clues on what emotionally solves is the problem and then solves the problem. And we started pitching when somebody was interested and they're like, yeah, I've tried building a spreadsheet and it doesn't work. It falls apart. I don't know the improvement rates on my team, but it's too hard to do. Now we're like, great. We've got them. Let's start looking at the demo and say, well, what if it worked this way? And then they say, then I could coach my team to do this thing more. I would know who to sub in and out more fairly. I would be able to tell parents, this is the improvement plan that your kid needs. Note that all of those things are not our product. They're justcribing what they would do because our product's working for them. That was the magic we looked for. Then as you can see in this spreadsheet, we started saying, well, who has the problem and we got more precise about the persona, about the ideal customer profile, we started building out these descriptions and then we moved to the right and did what any great product team does and said, what features can we build that actually create the answer to actually a conversation we've been having. And that's one of the main points here is you don't have to have the full product built to be chipping away at this offer. I just spent last year building a company from a kitchen table idea to launch and we ended up with $5.4 million in weight listed pipeline with signed letters of intent for a product that they had only heard about because the offer is a theoretical framework that you're chipping away at through these customer development sales types calls and the product is slowly getting sharper and more refined in how it delivers on it. So you can build a sheet like this and match the jobs to be done or problems with features identify which ones are hard, which ones are easy and find the minimum set that's going to create real value for your customers and now you know what your minimum viable product is and you keep building it. So back to the whiteboard, we go from nailing the demo which is when they describe what else they'll do. So now we have nail the unique value proposition and that's where we'll look at the anatomy of a value proposition. Here somebody is like now for the first time, oh products like this exist, there is a way to solve this problem. Why are they going to stay with you in that conversation instead of look elsewhere and you have to have some reason. Could be anything, could be you have those celebrity in this field on your platform, they use it. This is what everybody's doing. It's better because it's got the right brain science who knows what it is. But you have to have some unique reason for them to stay and you'll know you've done that when they have buying intent. When I was launching the kid's phone pinwheel, I did about 250 of these conversations as a founder with different parents asking them all kinds of questions but then working through down. Okay, we've got the problem statement. I've got this every time with a couple different demographics, I can say things like what plan do you have for your 12 year old to learn how to use a smartphone well and they'll say, oh, I don't have one or I can say what company do you trust out there, what tech company has the best interests of your child in mind and they all laugh. These are emotional driven problem statements, qualifies as we're getting down here. I know I've got buying intent when they're like how do I get one? I need my kid to have this. Like well doesn't exist yet. You can join our waitlist for a dollar or whatever it is, right? But you've gotten there to where there's a clear buying intent, not just like how much is it price question. This is still the behavioral one. The like how much is this? I'm ready. I want to go. Okay, good. Now you get to your last little piece. Which is the terms and conditions? What's tricky here is it has to work for both of them and you. You have to be able to build a business off of your terms and conditions if you copy pasted them a lot or a lot of times, be able to support that. It actually makes more money in the end than it costs you to deliver. They have to be able to say, yeah, the value that this is bringing to me is more than the cost to get it. So that could be anything. It can be 18 month contracts. It could be, you know, it's wildly different. But you know, you have that when they actually act. Now when they say they will act, when they actually act, that's why actions like paid wait lists and things are so important is because there are tons of people who will even maybe get to that point and say, yes, I would totally do something like this. And then you show up and you've built it nine months, 18 months later. And you're like, hey, I made the thing that you said you would do. And they're like, yeah, this is awesome. I can think of some other people who need it. That happens again and again. The value proposition has three main segments. And I like to abbreviate these VP. And I'll work with companies. I'll be like VP1, VP2, VP3. We have different theories. Sometimes we have full on business lines for different value props. And we equip sales people with a few of them. If you're doing a startup, you probably just need one. And then later you can do it. And then later you can do the third value prop. You build it up. So the problem statement, same thing as before. It's a that's right. Emotional, yes, not that's true. Cognitive, yes. But then you have the insight. This is our new piece for the value prop. So the insight is what you brought as Yoda to the table for the Luke to say, you need this. You need the skill and the force. You need a lightsaber. You need this, whatever thing is, you're the wizard, the mage, the power up a bringer. What unique insight did you bring that when they hear it, that's the aha moment. Oh, that. And you can say something like, you know, we've found if you have an outside team do the following activities, you will reliably and predictably gain a lot of sales from your podcast show. So just what if you found what is it that your company is based on, that unique insight and then benefit. So it goes problem statement, insight benefit. Here's what's funny is the problem statement actually is their world. The insight is your world and the benefit is their world. So in storyline terms, Mario wants to save the princess in the castle. The princess is the benefit and Mario can't do it is the problem statement. You are in the middle and whether that's, you know, the little mushrooms and stuff that make him big and he goes and shoots fireballs, like you're the one who would question, well, if you use fire, you can beat Mario and you can save the princess. Oh, okay. Now he can do that. And so the key here is that sales is not persuasion. When we do it this way with value propositions, instead sales is a value creation and the prospect gets their themselves. They already wanted to save the princess. They know just what to do with spitting fire once they see how it works and what it is. And so we get to have a lot more fun as founders and sort of remove some of that fear of the sale because we've mostly experienced that from bad sales people who are selling things that aren't inherently valuable to us. What we're doing as founders is we're creating new value. People love to hear about new value and they love to get there themselves. All we have to do is equip them. So we're looking at how do we hand the magical puzzle piece to the person but they take it from us and they put it on the table and they're like, wow, this finishes my puzzle. This is great. So that's our value proposition. And I want to show you one of the sales teams I worked with. Here's our Trello board. This was for next board and we were selling the tech company building board software for managing your school board. So if you've never seen a school board we worked with one that had a $2 billion annual budget. Three of the last board people were in jail or something like that. People share that each other like, oh, it's a weird stuff that happened. And this was all around how to govern better and using our software be more focused on student outcomes. So you can see here in the Trello board we had a lot of theories and this is kind of what you do to reset around your value propositions is value proposition one is to consolidate processes. Two was to put agendas and minutes into one solution and three was to comply with policies. This is like, you know, your sexual harassment policy, all the 180 policies you've got as a school district. So those were the three value propositions that a sales person had kind of in their briefcase to sell as they went around to school boards. And their job was to rapidly qualify which of these three value propositions are going to be the one that lands with this particular prospect. What do you think is the way they do that problem statement? If you landed the problem statement, now you're going to get into a great discovery conversation hearing about them describe the problem statement in their terms. And you're going to lock into the right value proposition. So we built below that here in the Trello board, things like if they're in this value proposition, here are three best case studies of customers and inside of that the full story, the statistics and everything here are complicating questions you can ask like how easy is it for you to search your policy database for keywords. Things that will help them discover the value that you are bringing to the table through your solution. So you can kind of organize your value propositions this way and that allows you to now add new sales members or your first one because you as the founder have to figure out who's the ideal customer profile and how do I get my first three or four details? And then from that point now you know what works and this is how to communicate what works. These are the value propositions that our customers experience. Here's how to communicate about that. So that's what we're trying to do value proposition wise and what I hope you're seeing is these value propositions are what's used live and tactically in a sales conversation. But you're always going back to that theoretical framework of the offer to figure out what is the underlying offer which part of it is converting better and better because the more you optimize that over time, the more valuable your company will be and the more copy paste your business model will be which leads to success over time. Okay the last thing that I want to show here is how to construct the offers for your go-to-market plan. So here's an outline that I like to use from this is one of many documents I have on seed stage offers. And this one is let's grab this one no fear firsts. We start with the value proposition which is the underlying experience of the offer. And so here you can see problem statement. You either just got funded or you're lining up meetings or something. Insight. Well start up sort of like rock climbing. You waste a ton of energy doing things that other people told you to until you learn the right skills. Turns out they're very uncommon skills that make you good at fundraising. The benefit is if you do what we're telling you to then you're going to unlock more funding and more speed with way less effort. So then we go down from there to how do you build the whole go-to-market funnel is you start asking what proof do we have that what I'm saying is true and so you use case studies you use research you use whatever you have at the time to prove that what you're saying is the value proposition is legit. Then you got to down to your audience who is your ideal customer profile. It's always going to be different people in this one it's early stage entrepreneurs and small teams. Then you ask where are those people and this is the foundation of great marketing. Marketing is not the arts and crafts. The oh I have a great design it's shiny. Marketing is now that I know my value proposition and who has it. Where can I find those people? Where can I rent audiences that already exist that give me access to lots of those people at the same time? If I'm going to go direct where can I do that in a way that financially makes any sense for the costs it's going to take to directly approach each and every one of them. And so you build out here your distribution strategy and different channels of like well if those people are on LinkedIn or social channels then that's where we're going to go. If those people go to masterminds then that's where we're going to go. If they're listening to podcasts then we've got to go book ourselves on some podcasts. Whatever the channel is for how that particular group finds information that's how you have to reach them. And so that tells you where to what tactics to invest in do not follow a marketing agency who just says okay we're going to do some SEO some SCM some PPC we're going to do some agile. Like well why are you doing ads? If the audience that I'm trying to reach doesn't even consume their information on the places that you're advertising makes no sense. But founders do it again and again because we don't know any better because we're not guiding the marketing strategy with value proposition in a deal customer profile. So the last piece that I want to show is one more item on marketing but this is like the very tactical how do I make an approach with someone. So here's an email that we improved with a founder where they were just kind of talking generally about their company. This is kind of who we are, what we do sort of stuff that you see very often. And we rewired it with this exact value proposition anatomy. My favorite way to write an email. So I want to show you here. This is a Trello card where we sort of experimented in it. Here's how I think about writing fantastic emails is the subject line. The subject line has to answer the question why should I read this? That's usually the best way to generate a subject line. Just ask yourself why should they read this? Answer that question. Well because if they do they'll see how they could make more money on the e-commerce store next year. Okay good that's a promising direction. We need to articulate that they're going to make more money on their e-commerce store next year when they read this email. So let's go look. I actually just drafted that yesterday. Here are the subject lines that we came up with. The autopilot Shopify weapon that nets 16 to $78,000 per year. Nice. We went right for why they should read this email. They will make 16 to $78,000 next year. If they do this kind of thing. The ideal customer profile will anyway. So our subject line goes with why should I read this. And then the body of the email is a problem statement and insight in the benefit. That's it. So we can write three to five sentence emails that communicate this. So this one here was a tech company around gathering evidence for victims of sexual abuse who feel shame and a lot of psychological barriers to actually reporting that evidence. And this person is a former sex crimes cop who's built a platform that makes it easier and feel less invasive to collect and share some of that evidence. So before she was sending this like who we are, what we do, kind of email. And we flipped it all the way around to have far better results. And so it goes like this. The subject is the less distrustful approach to evidence gathering that says resources and improves your reputation. It's focused by the way on cops on police stations. So that's why it's mentioned reputation. So then the problem statement. This is that evidence is often unreliable and people don't tend to report on stalking interviews. Every cop in the world who reads that is going to go, that's right. It's extremely time intensive to collect evidence for these representing high costs for truth. As you know, fewer than 40% of victims get their cases to court. Why? Poor evidence. Okay. So we've got the problem statement established. Then we moved to the inside. How impactful would it be if evidence was less distracting for victims to report? We found a way to make it easier. Let's say that's the whole insight. It's less distressing for victims to report it. That's what we have found is insightful. Benefit is more reliable for the officer saving time and resources and even the challenge of eliciting information from distrust victims. Now they can imagine their future. That's the benefit for them back in their story. And we end the email with what else can I tell you. That's it. That's a perfect cold or first email on any product or service is to communicate your value proposition. That's a long-winded way of saying I made this for you. Here's a problem I think you're experiencing and if you're not in, guess what? I found up this cool answer and your life's going to be better. What can I tell you? And then they're going to reply to that. We don't need to send anything more than that. If the value proposition itself is intractive or interesting, nothing else you say or do is going to be attractive or interesting. But that's why the founders have to do what I'm saying and figure this out very early on is you're finding the underlying factors of value. And yeah, over time you'll find different ways to communicate it, but still going to be the same thing. If you skip this, then you're going to go higher sales and marketing people and they're going to do their best to communicate in persuasive language. But they're going to be missing the underlying value that nobody has yet figured out. There's no short cut to this and there's no substitute for the strong theoretical foundation of chipping away at what is the value proposition you actually have and what is the underlying offer that it builds for the right ideal customer profile. If you can lock those things in as a founder and it only takes five or 10 commitments from real customers to do that, then the whole rest of your company can be built by professionals who are better than you because they're actually being equipped by you with this is the fuel that you need to go now do your skill. Go to your marketing thing, go do your sales things, lots more times with this material and they're going to all of the sudden be successful as well. Okay, so the question is how you actually choose your ideal customer profile, especially if you have several good candidates. And I do, I think this is one of the most paralyzing questions that founding team's face, especially those who are wired to be more consensus driven, which is pretty common in today's generation instead of decisive, which is like let's just go and pick one because you're looking for a criteria and outside influence and I think what's hard about starting a startup is you need to have great comfort levels with deciding without an outside voice telling you what to do. You're not going to be able to build a spreadsheet that tells you because if if you did, you'd be like, well, according to these criteria 80% goodish and according to those criteria 80% goodish. They're really close. It doesn't tell you what to do. So here's here's an example from a startup that I worked on last year in legal tech is they had, uh, here's our actual whiteboard discussion on market segments and we ended up with three really good possibilities. The plaintiff side personal injury, the defense side personal injury and insurance companies as the direct buyer of the results of this software platform and all of them made sense because the other two founders being an attorney on the defense side and a court reporting person who had sold to these market segments, we knew we could sell to all of them. We could imagine each one and we worked on jobs to be done offers. We interviewed multiple ones of these and we're like these all work which one are we going to focus on and the answer can't be all. Eventually it can't but you have to do one thing at a time at a startup or you're going to die. So I gave the answer here that I give to most founders who are trapped in this well it could work here it could work there which one is bigger. It doesn't matter as long as it's big enough choose the one you like is the answer because every day for the next year and a half you have to wake up and work on it. And so the one you like is probably the best one and so even though Skye is a defense attorney on the personal injury side he really liked the thought of selling to the plaintiffs side attorneys whether that's because a bunch of them are his friends because he goes up against them all the time or that's because they're cowboy mentality instead of their play at safe mentality is more interesting to him which I think more had to do with it he just liked that better cool none of us like insurance companies great great opportunity to scale there but that's not what's fun so we chose the one that was fun and built a 5.4 million dollar weightless pipeline on that which is pretty unheard of it doesn't matter which when you choose as long as they're all theoretically viable go with what your heart tells you is going to be the most fun let's talk about growth funnels what your building towards is a playbook of reliable growth for your startup that goes all the way from attention how you meet new people through referral how to those people once they're happy get more people to use your stuff how do you track that how do you build it up I want to show you a couple of funnels from startups on the other side or in the middle of seed stage and then go back to how do you build yours starting now so this one here that we're looking at was from a turnaround I did called townie and they're about buying banking and giving local so this funnel here was built this way because we didn't build it from scratch we built it from I was sort of observing what all is going on here we've got some advertising going on we've got some signups they even had billboards in various cities trying to get people to sign up and then kind of tried for a while and spent a whole lot of money and had very little progress I ended up helping this company launch in five key cities and I built the playbook by driving up to wakeo every day for about a month and a half and doing everything I could think of I talked to all the business owners food truck owners college students we spoke at bailer we spoke at the chamber of commerce and every time somebody had an intro to make we took that intro and then we said yes and I talked to more and more and more people and we got exposure and then built towards this funnel some of the things that surprised us that we didn't know would be growth drivers emerge through that for example there was this one business in wakeo called common grounds which is a really cool coffee shop that's been around for years they actually had a CRM with thousands of records of phones and email addresses of people in wakeo and they were willing to rent that out to the whole community on the app that we were building and then we were like well I wonder if anybody else at the CRM and it turns out some of the businesses did so we were able to build exposure that way we built Facebook groups like we just tried stuff and our funnel looked like this where we're sort of building out okay what's working we got this kind of ad thing it's building that kind of custom audience and what campaigns can we run against that well we went them to install the app we went there to like the page and then we're going to provide supplemental content that's sort of how this works on the product side we really worked hard on educational drip email campaigns this can be a really effective campaign for when someone has to take two steps in order to sign up for your product or service so an educational drip helps them take that first step just by learning something and then at the end of the educational drip they might choose your product or service as the next step so examples would be like let's take the kid phone since we've been talking about that and educational drip might be here's how to build a contract and plan with your child for their complete development into a full on a responsible adult smartphone user that would be a series of five or six emails that they get with some activities to do that'd be an educational drip it's free at the end of that you might be ready to start your journey by buying a kid's phone called pinwheel so that's sort of what these are on the map now I want to show you the pinwheel map which is even cooler and way better and follow the framework I'm about to teach you this is how it ended after about 18 months of my work there and I built this from scratch and we went from zero to a million dollars in nine months which is pretty great for a tech startup the top of the funnel here is all about awareness and outreach and you can see in the end this is mostly ads on the side of the map and over here we've got different channels so we've got a partnership with a key tech company that already has thousands of customers in our space we had an influencer and affiliate program that we built we have a Facebook group that we built and then partner site direct sales at conventions and direct sales at local events those are all the ways that people get to know us and we map it out that's awareness then down here are the landing pages focused on each specific audience so what the reason you want this is as you build up your awareness and attention you can see I'm routing different attention to different places so this ad if it's targeted towards tech dads should go to the tech dazzlinging page whereas this ad if it's targeted towards religious crunchy moms should go to the religious crunchy moms landing page and that's where you smack them with a two by four in the face called your value proposition it should sound just like the reason they came to that page and answered just the value proposition for just them from there they may discover the rest of your site I think one of the biggest mistakes that early stage founders make is they think their website is a sales tool your website is a legitness tool your main homepage shows that you're a real thing your selling is going to be done the digital side is going to be supported by landing pages that are you testing out your various propositions of value for each audience you don't want to rewrite your home page 50 times you want to create 50 landing pages in the background that are close clones of each other and you're routing all the traffic to that then they come to your website to prove oh yeah this is a real company oh look they have a team this and that so that's sort of how I route it with this and then you can see that's what these are these are explanation pages of the website going to check out but then we keep going we follow through to the adoption cycle and this is them starting the process of getting the product in this case there was some software and some mail so we've got an onboarding and fulfillment process to get them the product and then going through their complete setup and get started experience on the product towards referrals that's how a funnel looks the end okay so now we need to look at the actual framework you want to use to start your growth process some people call this pirate metrics and I like that because the acronym that you can use goes our awareness also known as outreach this is very first contact to acquisition how do you take that awareness and turn it into conversations that convert to a customer to activation now that they have a greed to become a customer how do we get them started on the experience of receiving value from what you've built and designed for them you can call this adoption next which is that they keep going on your platform and use it more and more and get more and more value from it and then referrals some people put revenue here there are a few other ways to cut this the core concept is what you need to grasp which is that your funnel is this whole thing start to finish and referrals come back on top and are another way to acquire new customers so it starts to become a growth machine you're going to want to have some number of activities in each one the minimum being one you need at least one awareness or outreach thing at least one acquisition thing for example my first awareness thing might be I am going to go give a public speech to a 12 person networking group and when I'm there anybody who's interested is going to book on my calendar so now calendar is my acquisition tool and speaking is my awareness action or tool process thing on your box so then after the calendar is booked I am going to be asking them to become a customer and if they do I then have to have a way to get them started sign up and to start delivering service to them but then I want to have some process to check in whether that's really fancy B to B stuff like we do a monthly customer review session or we just look at analytics and we email them or anything in between we have to have some way to make sure that they're continuing to use the platform the product, the tool and getting value out of it and so we have some activity there and that might be a let's call this one amenual email process. That's really it that's a starting funnel but then you and your co-founder have some ideas you're like well we could also try speaking on this podcast we could also try going to this event this conference oh if we're going to go to an event or conference we want to have as our acquisition tool CRM so we get a hub spot free CRM and create a form there and that form is where people type in their email or whatever to say to their interested and then we continue that acquisition journey by sending them a follow up email well shoot why don't we add a lot of value in that follow up email that follow up email includes a free tool from us something an ROI calculator an assessment I don't know but we're working towards so you can see now we're drawing multiple lines in boxes because we're starting to build out our funnel into in so I've got lots of these I have miles of these this is what I do with most founders when I meet them is say let's just build a map of what awareness things are you doing now what acquisition things are you doing now what activation things are you doing now and then we can think of more and choose what we're going to do or if that's not the bottleneck we can think of better ways to improve down the funnel sometimes I recently actually met with a founder who says he's got so many calls but that he's bought on that on closing them so how do we solve that problem well we can come up with a low ticket offer where people can sort of close themselves by doing a paid driver for you buy or we can add a sales person and split the duty of closing do you think you can generate enough revenue to do that what are some other acquisition ideas you have and we just build out that piece of the funnel so once you get it started starting as the hard part you can start thinking more and more and more of these and so that connects back to what you saw on the pinwheel map which is after a year and a half of doing this your funnel into end might look something like this it doesn't start that way it ends that way my favorite tool for doing this is whimsical whimsical is my favorite diagraming software and here you can see a funnel that I'm just getting started for this client I was talking about called warriors way mindset we've actually been digging into what his funnel even is because there are a couple of competing views on it and then we found some old buried links and systems and tools that previous marketing agencies who placed on him had built for him it's sure enough if not even a connected funnel and so we're figuring out how to connect it but you can see here his awareness is primarily built around TikTok it's got a quarter million followers there all the other socials are not working well the only place he's driving is to a website which has a book a call button that means the biggest opportunity is probably to get more precise around acquisition and instead of driving people to a home page on the website to drive them to landing pages specific to the content that you're delivering that day on your social platform that's going to be a far more reliable acquisition strategy and help you figure out what offers value propositions and statements are working better or worse and then we're adding this nurture campaign so that they get a bunch of emails giving them free content and help that help you experience what it would be like to sign up for this guys community and get his coaching so this is the process I like to use is very simple you just click and draw lines and boxes and this tool is free up to I think 2003,000 items or something like that so you can get really far on your startup and I have on multiple startups building out your funnel according to this process here so go get them with pirate metrics art. So here's an example landing page you can see this meet the kid phone that outperforms gab the only way you're going to get to that landing page that's the key part this is an acquisition part of the funnel is because you searched said did something that has us knowing you're already looking at gab. If not we want to make sure you don't get to this landing page we don't want to put this on the main menu of the website we want this to only be for the people who are looking at gab and if there's another competitor like let's call it apple screen time or whatever it is the Google family link we want to have a landing page for each of those meet the kid phone that outperforms Google family link but the only way to get there is because you are searching for or interacting with family link type content so we know to serve that to you exactly at the right time this here landing page is just a direct comparison of pinwheel to gab and it's got some check marks some ex marks some calls to action some very specific product reviews of parents talking about one product versus the other and so on so it doesn't have to be long though there are two main forms of landing page and they are a long form and short form so you can actually look up great examples just say long form landing page examples and you're probably going to find your way into about 50 click funnels yourself and they're going to start emailing you because you're going to click on their awesome pages and they're going to know you did that you're going to start getting random ass of stuff but there's a lot of great examples like these on how to do that I tend to before a short form because in the earliest days because with my short form ones I find them more easy to clone and repeat so you just end up with the problem statement the inside the benefit of video or a picture and then some sort of call to action that's my favorite way to do a landing page so you'll see some of these short form ones I'm like that like here's a really great example of a short form one there's just a little image some words and a way to declare interest and either you like it or you don't and you move forward in the funnel from from that kind of thing here's another really easy short form one get access to this here's what it is fill out the form to get started those are short form landing pages how many landing pages what I have at a different time yeah it depends on what I'm trying to figure out so if I'm trying to figure out for example which call to action works best it could depend on a lot of factors like I have 10 ideas or because I tend to be more decisive I probably don't but I am on a team or I have a co-founder or there's some level of anxiety and our team if we want to have 100 ideas I don't care just copy and paste that landing page 100 times and let cycle through the ideas and see which ones outperform the next ones there is a lot of like tech out there to help you AB test and rapidly double down on what works I tend to find that my hunchers are pretty okay and it's not worth it to overdo the science there as long as you've got good enough conversion so I'm more likely to have three or five landing pages if I'm by myself I'm using landing pages for almost everything so if I'm in a Facebook group and it's about a specific problem I want to have I want to have a landing page for that kind of problem or that kind of audience and that's the only page I'm ever giving out for that and then if I am speaking at an event landing page just for that event that's something that we always do on Washington Tree P is like this is our event landing page and we're going to this next event let's make it at landing page just for that which gets you both the advantage of speaking directly to the audience and the advantage of attribution you know that the only way that possibly even could have converted on that page is because they got to that page and the only way they would get to that page is they're looking live at your presentation deck that says go to this link right here right now that's kind of a helpful part about it. How old are you think members have to have forever be able to know before you like you should use one. I think you should do multiple landing pages from the very beginning if you're competing around ideas so for example if you have three audiences you want to try make one landing page for each audience the worst the the utility of a landing page is that it keeps you from compromising and watering down your message so if at any point you have multiple competing messages and you're not sure which one to go with express each one it's in its own medium as it deserves so this is less about format and more about content I want different landing pages because I really want to funnel the right person to the right thing instead of saying everything mush to everyone at the same time. How long do you think we spend creating the first landing I don't take very long creating my landing pages at all because I've done the theoretical work that we've already talked about of understanding the underlying value proposition so the landing page itself guess what it tends to be problem statement and site benefit. I might add a little bit more I might add like a testimonial under the benefit if I have one I might add a little bit more on the insight like here's an example of the product in action if I have it but at its core my landing pages are problem statement insight benefit and it called action so a fair amount of that will be something that you can here you go you can wireframe very easily on a sketchbook or an iPad so if you just like draw your landing page and then throw it to your graphics person or your web person or use one of those builders like pretty much all sites have any more hub spot does it swear space wicks word press most of them drag and drop the elements this heading one image that video link fill out these little boxes with these little words you've got a landing page clone it replace those words you know yeah it's it's uh they're not really good excuse in my opinion to not be able to rapidly create a landing page as long as you know what you want to say same things as with slides right like if you're ever making a slide presentation the worst thing to do is open up a slide presentation and start making it if you don't know what you want to say yet but if you're outlining the slide presentation then the day that you actually open power point it just almost writes itself because you know what you want to say and you know how it should roughly look and then just kind of pop it in that's how landing page is ought to be you already know who you want to reach and what the value is now you're ready to open the landing page editor and make one the main thesis of this course is that founders should close their first deals and a lot of founders are afraid to do that because they haven't closed a lot of deals in their past or because their experience with sales is shady or douchey what I want to show you in this segment is how approachable it is as a founder to go through the main types of conversation that happened to close deals we're already taking from the last segment that our main idea here is to create value and to be constantly assessing how much value are we really creating and that makes it a little more fun and a little more like a puzzle a little more open to introverted thinking and a little less like a half to dominate and I have to desperately close these deals so there are four or five main types of conversations you're going to hit and I want to talk through them by talking through a company that I started called Stadup. Stadup was skill tracking for youth sports so we built an app that folks could test their skills in their backyard or to soccer field using very simple low grade equipment and the app would do time or repetitions or different things that helped you set it up and keep track and benchmark right. So the main types of conversations that we had to take that through kind of the go in a specific flow as you're developing a deal and the flow of those conversations is first of all you are going to have discovery conversations. So right here you can see this is the discovery wheel we call it developed by Steven Tomlinson copy right 2018. Steven Tomlinson has been my mentor in sales and communication and we are now associates in some of the work that we do and we've coached this process with lots of people. The key is that this discovery wheel process has a very effective trust building mechanism built in where you don't end up feeling awkward because if you proceed in the exact order it's naturally wired the way a trustful relationship develops without bouncing or being too pushy. So at Stadup we learned how to have these discovery conversations and use this process. I'll explain that more as we go through some of the cases we're going to go deep into each one of these tools. But the next kind of conversation you ended up having is a demo conversation. After you've discovered using this process that there is potential value there in the customer or prospect is leaning into that you're going to have to nail the demo. Now the demo has its own process which is usually built on your tool and checking in for value. So I want to show you that because most founders make a fatal mistake and they treat demos as product walkthroughs. Almost like here's the instruction manual. Can you figure out what you're going to do with it? That's why you should buy it instead of letting the customer discover the product almost like uncovering a map and age of empires or you know some very story driven approach where they're getting to exercise their brain in curiosity and value finding and you end up guiding them through a demo. Usually those demos by the way are shorter than product walkthroughs because you get to exactly what the heart of what they're interested in is. And so at startup we would usually demo by having someone log in and say here this is a fully established functional account we've made. What's the most interesting thing? And they go click on stats or they click on team or they click on players or they click on tests and we would just say why are you clicking on that first what's interesting about that to you? They would tell us and then I'd say you know I suggest maybe clicking on this see what happens and I'd like to know what you think. How do you imagine using that with your team and it's actually a very guided conversation as they were discovering around the startup product. That was a very fun way to do it. Then the next kind of conversation in the flow of your sales conversations is the negotiation. So presuming that we have nailed the problem statement and created the possibility of value through our discovery call and nailed the demo to where this looks really promising. Now we're going to want to figure out how do we work together. That's a negotiation. So the negotiation format that we use is the negotiation board here. We call this the strategy board actually for how do you strategize for a negotiation call and we're going to walk through some of these cases as well. The key points are what makes it hard and then easy is when before the conversation you lock in for yourself what is a reasonable objective which means what can they say yes to in that conversation? Often that's a lower bar than you might imagine. Well I want them to say yes to trying it. I want them to say yes to paying for one month of it or whatever it is. That's the only thing we're going to focus on and we sort of eliminate other distractions as our goal and then we're going to figure out what is our generous intent for them. What this means is we're translating from the previous two conversations where the value is for them. So if we can walk into our negotiation being able to say I want to help your team improve faster or I want to help you prove your value as a coach whatever it is that we've learned from the prior calls when we shove that in there and have a generous intention for them. Now we're always going to force these two to work together which means it works for them and it works for us. We're going to find an objective that we need them to say yes to that we need but we're going to make sure it fits into a generous intention meaning they're really as value for them and there's tons of magic to be had there. So I think I already gave some examples of startup what that might be but it's always dependent on the prior conversations you have to have been listening, taking notes and reflect. Then the last kind of conversation that's pretty predictable is the gatekeeper conversation. Often you end up talking to someone who is the barrier that you have to get through to talk to the person who actually makes the decision or the committee or whatever. So gatekeeper conversations are actually fairly predictable and there's a fairly straightforward strategy for working with the gatekeeper to open the gate and it all has to do with process discovery. What is the process their company or that person that they're guarding the gate for uses to make decisions and when we're curious about it instead of trying to beat down the door, the gatekeeper will open up the door for us. Much like the discovery wheel there's an extremely specific order in which we have that conversation that if you follow that sequence, always establishes trust and finds the way to open the door. So at startup some of our gatekeepers would be when we're talking to a club our entry point might have been a parent or a coach and we want to get to the club level to sell our skill tracking software to the entire club because you can benchmark your different teams and so on. So we have to plan something like this and have an interaction with a coach that might be like who else should we talk to at your club to see if they want to benchmark against your team and that person might say this person and that person and then I would say what do those people care about when it comes to team development? And now it gives that coach the chance to describe things about them and I might have follow up questions. These aren't just one single question unloads. You might have a whole conversation about what do the higher-ups care about with a gatekeeper. Then we have to figure out how do they like to see information and as we're working with the gatekeeper and might even end up saying something like I want to make sure when we actually do talk to the higher-ups that you look great by bringing this to them. That's our goal so that the gatekeeper feels at ease that we're not trying to take advantage of them but we're actually going to help them look great and we end up building a case and so we had different clubs where one coach might say well they actually need to see the results for any kind of tools we've tried this thing before and that thing before and everybody's kind of like given up on it so we're going to have to actually use it for a month or two and go with those results where somebody else might say oh yeah they actually meet about new tools and processes once a month and that meeting is coming up here so you're just how to get up or sure to that and get on the agenda or whatever so how they make decisions become something we talk to the gatekeeper about as we're discovering the process of decision making then we offer only that and exactly that that's the key for getting through the gatekeeper whatever the gatekeeper says on how the higher-up likes to receive information we offer to package our information that exact way I'll have a one-page email to you by the end of the day I'll have a case study in your email inbox by the end of the day I'll invite them to this next meeting where we're doing that I'll add them to the webinar whatever it is we'll make the offer of that thing and then we make an ask for our next follow and that's the way through the gatekeeper so we make the offer to the club to pitch them or describe to them how other proteins are using it because that's what they want to see okay great and then we ask for a specific date and show up and do it so that's the way through the gatekeeper one of the most important sales that a founder ever closes is actually the investment which believe it or not works by exactly the same mechanic so I want to make sure we look at some of those as well when you are selling to investors you're actually packaging an offer of equity in exchange for capital to do a thing that they're interested in which is grow that equity to more cash later based on the seas that they already have so let's take a look at the discovery wheel here up on my iPad usually you don't have to take exhaustive notes this is a mental thought model I've committed it to memory and I help people plan using this with all of these kinds of questions but at the end of the day it's a pretty natural conversation you and a rotator around the discovery wheel to establish value of what potential impact what's promising here so I'll show you in Trello and some other tools different sales cards or materials that help progress you through this wheel let's talk real quick venture capital though so I remember with startup one of the venture capitalists that we spoke to was a northeastern firm and we got on the phone and I do what I usually do which is I asked them what is your firm looking for and you can actually get a lot out of a venture capitalists who will tell you about their thesis or their plans or you know what year their fund is in are they early in the fund late in the fund sometimes they're talking to you and they don't even have the money to invest yet so you can learn a fair amount about them and their objective what I think many founders do is they just assume that venture capitalists are sitting there waiting to write checks and you pitch you get a check and it doesn't work anything like that so what we want to do is start with their objective what's your position on the sports tech market and so this is really interesting having this conversation with these people because we ended up talking a little bit about how they see the soccer market or what attention have they paid to the soccer market and he goes well I don't really like the soccer market and I don't like the image on the cover slide of your deck here because girls don't play soccer and my co-founder and I are like okay it's actually the fastest growing sport in America for girls we've won the world cup multiple times and really famous for it and here's the number of millions of girls who play soccer in this country and he's like nope I don't see it girls don't play soccer so we sort of discovered that this would be a dead end because we couldn't even get past the objective now what a big fat waste of time it would have been to pitch an entire company and spend 30, 45 minutes an hour on that with someone who doesn't even have an objective to invest in this market because they don't believe the market's big so we got off that call in another VC conversation though it went more like this we see the emergence of a sports tech market rapidly growing and believe that analytics based and stats based companies are going to be some of the most significant players in that we're looking to find one to put to our into our portfolio that's actually a really common type of answer across different markets for venture capitalists and then we might say okay so your objective is to find an up-and-coming stats based you know sports tech company how are you finding them now and so we're going around the discovery wheel to their approach what are you looking at now how are you determining which types of analytics and segments and they'll tell us they'll say well we're especially interested in automation technologies and we're especially interested in the pro sports side and we'll say well why how is that going for you too and they'll say well we're only considering two or three companies right now and so on and so we'll follow this wheel pretty precisely and that's why want to give you here a non-exhaustive list of conversation questions and then let's transition that to some of our sales conversations as well so getting out of venture capital markets and into regular sales the most common thing that I see founders make as a mistake is they come in and they say here's who we are here's what we do what that does is it short circuits every single one of these red boxes on the wheel and goes straight to impact it's a giant pounce and you might get it right some percentage of the time by the way some people when you say this is who we are and what we do they automatically do the work of their own objective and approach not working right and the results not being what they want and facing challenges and they've been just looking for something like this and oh my gosh here it is and you have an ongoing conversation the percentage of your ideal customer profile that's ready to buy just like that and can automatically connect those dots is far lower than the percentage of ideal customer profile who really will gain value from your solution so you want to become a master at this conversation where your first conversation with someone might be like this hi I'm Isaiah you're whoever what brought you to this call today and they can say well a friend of mine recommended your company and we're really struggling with how we optimize our ERP systems so they've started at challenges on the discovery wheel I want to move back I do not want to start with their challenges I want to go way back to objective and I want to say well what are you really trying to achieve this year with your ERP systems they're going to say oh well there's this or that and then I'll say what kind of initiatives have you introduce in your company to achieve some of those goals and why and they're going to talk because people love to talk about themselves and they're going to be focused on the objective now what I found is a lot of founders have heard really common advice like well you should ask more questions yeah you should ask more questions but what does that really mean this is what you're going with a discovery conversation is as soon as you can figure out what the objective is now move to the approach well what kinds of things are you trying right now to have those ERP systems integrate and work more for you and they'll be like well we've hired a team we have bought this is that or we're doing trials and then we go to how are those results working for you and so I think you're getting the point is you go in the very specific order and it's a natural conversation yes you're asking more questions but they're very directional you are going somewhere in your conversation and this is where you're going in your conversation so if we pull back up the next board sales cards that we looked at earlier what I want you to see is what's at the end of this discovery which is you're going to figure out which value prop is relevant because you discover the client's objective what they're trying how it's going what's holding them back what they'd imagine the best thing to look like and ideas that they're trying right now you're able to articulate and land to them a problem statement that is actually relevant in their lives and you're going to say so it sounds like you're trying to and now insert one of the names of your value propositions you might customize it a little bit based on what you've learned but you're buying large listening during this discovery process to see which value proposition actually is a proposition of value for them so I'm talking with a school board and I've got these three value propositions that you see here consolidate your processes put agendas and minutes in one solution and manage policy compliance part of what I'm doing in this discovery conversation is figuring exactly which one of those to lead with once we're done with discovery so watch it go all the way through I'm speaking with I'm thinking of very specific client in mid-texus that we spoke to their school board and so I'm speaking with the assistant superintendent in a discovery conversation and I say hi what has gotten you to be interested to have a conversation with me and she says well I was sent here because we're in trouble with the Texas education agency and required to have a conversation with you so I know her guard is up she doesn't want to have this conversation and so I am going to steer to the objective until I get something there and can say it back to her that's the start of trust and so say well that doesn't sound fun and I wouldn't want to talk to me if I was you tell me about what you all are setting as a goal to get out of trouble with the Texas education agency and she says well we have to demonstrate that our board is having direct impact on student outcomes okay so my brain goes do I want to consolidate processes agendas and minutes and one solution or manage policy compliance and so I'm going to go down the discovery wheel on one of those I'm going to choose manage policy compliance and this may be wrong but these questions are always free in trust when you pursue them in the right order and so I could say what are you doing right now to increase those student outcomes via your policies and she might say we're not doing anything right now because the board squabbles about cheerleader outfits in the football team budget now I know something case that that's what's going on well how's that working for you well we actually have a substantial number of third graders who can't read and that's what has flagged us as a low performing district I know it's important and I don't feel like anybody cares about what me as an assistant superintendent or my superintendent think because they've got their own priorities and listen to the parents and are worried about their own elections and so it just comes back to football and cheerleading okay I think I understand the challenge pretty well already ideally what would happen how should this go and that's where we're starting to get her to tip towards some magic for me and she says well ideally we would be able to prove that the efforts we're making are increasing are improving student outcomes and we get the Texas education agency out of our hair cool now my brain is going maybe manage policy compliance that value proposition three isn't the right one I maybe want to actually get into the agendas and minutes in one solution one because that's when we're at we in our software directly tie a line between board activities and the exact time that they're spending on student outcomes versus other things towards student outcomes and we have all these case studies about that of it just improving student outcomes literally by showing that a school board spent nine minutes of a four hour board meeting on student outcomes and all the rest of the time on things that aren't student outcomes that's a cool part of our solution and it has helped transform lots of school districts because it's based on Steven Kovie research if you just measure it and look at it you'll automatically start improving it and then board is like oh crap we need to spend more time on that so that's when my brain's going value proposition two then I ask her well what ideas do you have right now to make an impact what you're looking at and she says we're looking at consultants and we're also looking at new initiatives and honestly I'm thinking about moving districts because I'm not sure I can do anything here then I say if you could do something here and I asked the magic impact question what difference would it make for your school district and she'd say well it would be everything because we'd actually be helping kids be ready for their lives good okay so now I've got some emotional weight behind this magic question what difference would this make for your business and I get to make the link now between the end of my discovery conversation and a value proposition if I succeed at making that link she's going to want to demo if I fail at making that link the fun part of doing it this way is I can try again within other value proposition so I need to state her impact back to her with the end of this cycle which is a problem statement so I say it sounds like your board is in mired in the wrong issues you're in trouble with the T.E.A and you need a way out of it but you're going to have to convince the board that it's the right thing to do and what's making it hard is you want to do it fast but you don't think they really care that's a problem statement I've constructed based on the signals and clues that we've got going on and it links to my value propositions and she either says that's right or she says no that's not quite it and she corrects me and it's just like a regular relationship conversation where I just am in a little loop there I've asked what else how would you say that differently and we go back and forth until there's a solid problem statement now I can land my value proposition and I can say we've found that when boards have the actual time spent per issue tracked and publicly available and you categorize it by student outcomes and not student outcomes the board automatically starts changing their behavior for very low cost let's hit that's all I say I'm floating this one value proposition and she says okay tell me more because she's interested or she says oh that would never work and I ask her why and now we're having a real just back and forth and that's where we get to play these sales cards that we've prepared but like complicating questions like well are you leveraging board book right now to manage your minutes or are you using Google Drive and she tells me how they're doing it and we have all the prep work that we've done we get to access that sometimes clients are confused about their own problems and the actual point of this whole discovery wheel is that when you say the problem back to them they are going to be smarter because you did it that way you're pulling together different things and so if they come to the calling like this is it this is the problem and your brain is racing saying that doesn't sound like the real problem go back in the discovery wheel more and go back to objective or approach and say okay so if that's the problem what other things were you trying to solve that problem earlier who came up with it and why who cares about the problem and why those are objective questions and as they do that you're going to end up being able to play a card that guides them a different direction it might just be a straight up insight which sounds a lot like a challenge so you could say it's a challenging statement and you say we found that some people who have problem X that you're talking about actually have problem Y and Z as well and at solving that takes care of X. Is it your lips? See what happens. So in the case of next board and the school boards if we're talking to someone and they say the problem is we have this one unruly board member who always takes us down a rabbit hole around budget when we're supposed to be talking about student outcomes. Now it sounds like the problem is the person that's what I could say but I don't think the problem is the person so I might say we've found that when your reporting back to the public shows how much time each person spends talking about specific issues they immediately start holding themselves accountable because they know their public is going to hold them accountable too. These discovery conversations can last anywhere from five minutes to 50 minutes on average usually if it's someone very early on in the process and they came to you through a referral or a cold reach out it's going to be a longer discovery conversation. However if they came in a little bit warm because they saw a demo they clicked on content marketing they been following you for a while is probably going to be a shorter conversation. The key is that you go through the steps in your mind and sometimes someone's answer to one of your questions might literally solve three at once because these are intuitive so somebody might say oh yeah we've been trying this and it hasn't worked for us because and now they've knocked out approach results and challenges from the discovery wheel and you can just go to the next well ideally what would happen how do you see this working so you have to be kind of adapted and adaptive and see this more as a mental model to go through then a specific time budget but just know some people are very resistant you sometimes end up with group calls and you might have really long conversations like this. I work on a legal tech product in the AI meets personal litigation realm and the people that we were discovering from tended to be personal injury attorneys on the defense side or the plaintiff side meaning the billboard lawyers that you see. So they might have different ways that they start the conversation with us and we need to get back to the objective in order to proceed through. So if I'm on the call with someone and they say yeah I've heard that you can automate a lot of our process in the transcription area I might say what has you interested in automating your process in the first place and they can say well it sounds cool and I could say what kind of results do you usually see from things that just sound cool versus things that like really drive a difference for your business and they'll say this or that I'm like that wasn't a great question let me try again. What priority is it for you right now to actually be more efficient in your discovery process? Let's say and not that much of a priority but then I can say we've found that the deposition processes around 30% of the cost of most cases that are you know have witnesses how important is it to you to reduce those costs and pass those costs on your client and we might have a back and forth for a while as I'm pushing towards the objective. Let's take another example. I'm selling B to B software for internal survey and discovery of problem so 360 reviews that kind of thing so I'm talking to maybe somebody out of Fortune 500 company and I'll say what kind of initiatives do you all have this year to increase engagement and retention from your employees and they might say oh yeah we're doing this one and I can say how is it going which is a look at results but I probably want to stay right there on objective and say what led to the creation of this initiative as one of the top things that you all decided to do this year. Now I'm going to get real objective information they're going to say well we had this problem last year budget cuts or this and that and then I'm going to still say and you know when the executives decided to make this an initiative what was the next thing that they could have chosen that they didn't like what made this a priority I can really stay there for a while or I can feel satisfied and that's going to be kind of up to you. Last of all I'd say let's take a look at a complete consumer oriented but high ticket offer sort of things so like I'm going to just invent that we're selling Oculus's you know be our headsets or something and I'm talking to a consumer and they're planning to you know pay upwards of a hundred dollars for this item and so I say what are you hoping to achieve with VR and they'll be like well it just looks cool and I'll say what seems cool so far and they're like well it's a completely immersive experience and then I'll say what do you what seems attractive to you about the idea of an immersive experience and they'll say well increased focus on what I'm doing but also just like the fun of it of I've left this world and gone to that world. Now I actually could say I've got some pretty strong objective information from that interaction they really want to have experiences where they leave their office and go to ten about two or whatever fantasy world it is there and then I can say what kinds of things do you do for that right now and they can say I have an Xbox but and we can go down that conversation so chipping away at objective I think you do have to get creative but I don't think it's hard if you start with just these four questions what are you trying to do what's the goal of an initiative what's driving it what do you want the investment to accomplish like we have listed here I think the follow-up questions are going to be very natural and intuitive because what you're trying to do is find the energy that's why this is at the top of the wheel if you can hear you'll know that's what that's where the energy is here they're really actually trying to do something now it's very natural because they care when there's the energy there to say what are you trying to do now to make that happen how is that going for you what's holding you back and keep going on the wheel so across the different industries these discoveries may need to be more intense based on more work that you're trying to do for example if you're trying to win an five-year contract with a government agency or a large B2B deal with a fortune 50 company you are probably going to have to discover from multiple executives and you're almost like the one mirror that five different people are walking into the bathroom and looking at and then you go back and you're like here's the composite and you're going to actually be discovering discovering discovering multiple times and several times and then coming back and saying well you know what your colleague said it seemed a little more like this and so I wonder if we can check back in on the objective how those objectives change or their different facets to them and so you might be bouncing all around and that's what is like to build the case for a major deal at a massive company or government agency down market you know in e-commerce or a small B2B deals where there's one decision maker or fewer decision makers or high ticket B2C basically the scope and scale of this conversation reduces. The conversation itself, human to human is pretty much always the same but the amount of times you need to do it who you need to be involved in that subject matter that's always going to change so what I love about this model is I could use this model as the front person at my local dance studio and some new couple walks in and they're here for a trial class and I can say hey what's got you coming in here and they're like well we want to learn to dance better why what's what's exciting about dance to you I don't know I mean this and that I don't think that's good enough so I'm gonna say why you two why not somebody else and they're going to say what we like doing new stuff together awesome so I imagine that finding new skills to do together and that you could travel around the world and become for doing in any place would be a really fun source of connection and they might say yeah now I'm sort of like force feeding them and I'm jacked up a little bit but at the same time that's really what's there and so that's what great retail sales people do same thing if you don't link a purse or a shoe or a dance class to having shot and feet or covered legs or dancing you link it to something else feeling awesome you're selling like this experience you're selling connection right and there's an emotional value there and we're gonna try to find that and that's a real objective is when we find the emotional value they're here because they want to do something new on date night and they want to love it you don't freaking care that it's dancing or they've got a big event coming up and they need to nail that dance so they're not embarrassed in front of 150 people and they don't know how to do that kind of dance right wildly different objectives but if you can get to it where's the fear the happiness the joy the emotional side of the objective then you'll be succeeding across all industries and all sizes of companies you are looking for the energy closest to being on the call for you that you have a strong sense you can deliver on so if their main initiative for the year is well we've got to improve our HR software but you don't even sell HR software you've got finance software you're going to say okay what about your finance objectives and you're going to find something that's lesser energy but related to your thing and if they don't have any energy for it that's also I guess the point of this wheel is you could offer it at any point they could say actually we did have a financial objective and we just implemented new software and we're gonna have to see how it works before I can tell you what results were really having or not you're probably dead ended there somebody's very unlikely to switch financial software a month after they've just chosen financial software unless they're experiencing extreme challenges so that's the end of your conversation unless you have some other value proposition that is related so when you only have half the solution to the main challenge what you want to do is in this impact segment at the end basically test how much of your solution is still worth implementing cost or action for them so you could say we really are experienced at solving this half of your problem what difference would just solving half of it make for you and see what they said this piece here seems like you're going to have to have two different solutions to solve I'm curious whether a partial solution and progress in one of these two areas would make any sense to meet your objective or do you need both I want to show you one more example of some of the prep work that helps you through this by taking a look at the this companies established Austin SaaS companies playbook for handling its hardest conversations where we built these card decks with them on each of their hardest conversations the type that we're really focusing on right now is value in value conversations which is what discovery often is we want to walk into the room with these different cards to play and you're seeing some entrello over here with the different value propositions and cards here that give us evidence and questions for a back and forth here we've developed these cards literally they look like cards and if you look over on the iPad you'll see down here this is for negotiation that I actually did but first we had a discovery call and these were the four cards that I brought to that discovery call this one happened to be about government services work and so the cards I brought were around a deal one another deal one I have a card of an offer that we have for them and then I have some data of how this is gone elsewhere those are the cards I've brought to play in the conversation at the end of the discovery wheel so zooming all the way back out as a founder in a discovery conversation you're really going somewhere you have to tie value to an objective that they have already and it may take a couple questions to establish that especially if they came in on a triet demo or book a call thing where they they walk into the call and they just say show me the software you're going to have to go way back to what what are you hoping the software does for you and start with the objective in order to have a productive conversation so this is the specific order in which you can build value in a conversation and where you're going with a discovery call at the end of it you're linking into deploying one of your value propositions by landing a problem statement and getting a that's right from your prospect and then you just discuss the value proposition and you go back and forth after that you're going to end up in a demo the demo is either on the same call or on a later call usually it's on the same call if you have a single bioretype software solution where you can just show them they're the decision maker usually it's on a future call if they're going to be multiple decision makers involved and you say okay let's figure out how to build the right demo and what's going to be the right demo for you so there's no one way to do that demo could be immediate demo could be later as we're going to learn in the final segment one of the key rules of engagement for effective trust building sales conversations that you're really going to love because it slows down the tempo and makes you not pushy and gives you time to think is that you play one card at a time or you make one point per turn and so what we view this as is we view these sales conversations as a card game or a puzzle game there's a lot of metaphors you can use but as a card game it's like crazy aids or peanut gold or something like that I play a card then you play a card then I play a card then you play a card instead of me playing five cards and then seeing what you do so we're doing that to progress in the exact right direction so that each is next card that we play responds to develops on and works from the last card the prospect has played the last bit of information they've given us so with those cards metaphors you walk into these discovery conversations with different prepared turns that you may reach to now I say may because often the best card to play is the one our brain thinks of in the moment when we're using this method because we're really actively listening and we might have a standard move which is to follow the clue if somebody says yeah I've been really frustrated and angry with our current software provider instead of us saying you know playing a prescripted card like well we're really good to work with instead you would say I'm gonna play a card I'm making up on the spot of following the clue and I'm gonna say what's got you frustrated and angry at them that's the story they want to tell us so we have half of our cards are prepped and half of them will come up in the moment so these cards we're looking at here you can see on the left hand side we have prepared cards like question cards data cards and offer cards and challenge cards over here on the right with the next board school board stuff we have complicating questions info cards and case study cards this SAU 60 means a case study so these are the three main card types we prepared for this value proposition so as you become better and better at how your startup creates value you're gonna build more cards for each value proposition that your sales team can take so that they play the exact right card at first you might only have one case study but then when you have 10 case studies you want to be providing at each case study as its own playable card where your sales person can qualify and determine which is the best case study to play here because it's most similar to the customer that I'm talking to you don't want to talk about a portion 2000 client as your case study when you're talking to a SMB and vice versa so that's how cards get developed over time is these are just data points or key questions you find help the client discover value in your sales conversation and you're gonna play them one one card at a time there's probably not an exhaustive list of the types of cards but there are four or five cards that I continually go back to um data makes total sense right a data or a case study card this is uh I use data to say like market data so hey did you know this many companies are adopting that kind of thing so we're kind of creating either fear or foam or something like that something I need to respond to case study is this client of our experienced value now we get to challenging and questioning our prospect this is helping them think because that's really what we're doing with this kind of sales process is we're thinking together they have a company and business to run they have a company and business to run and we are powering them up with the little part that our company can play in their company's life and life cycle so we might challenge them to think differently to open up a category in their brain for what we have to offer so in the board management one we have this complicating question how easy is it for you to search your policy database for keywords that's a great complicating question because the administrator might have their list of policies in a non-sertial format and just that's the way it is we have a Microsoft you know um file browser and I have to go through all 250ish policies but I kind of know in my brain which ones are where so I asked this complicating question how easy is it for you to search your policy database for keywords and then they'll say well you can't really search it or we don't really have keywords or something like that well that's opening their mind towards what we've found so then I play an insight card well we've found that when your database and keywords for policies are well defined the public and board members actually can consume exactly what they need in real time and you have far more compliance to the policy and understanding of the policy that's my insight card that I just played so uh complicating questions and insights are basically just statements you make that help progress them towards value so your demo is not a walkthrough your demo is actually demonstrating value instead of demonstrating product because remember if the demo works if you've nailed it they're going to see the value as happening and start telling themselves a story of what else they're going to do with their time money whatever what else they can do so a successful demo is meeting the intellectual gates that they have for assessing value enough that whatever you have fully plugs the whole or the puzzle piece completes the picture and now they can move on the minimum requirements of a demo then are you need to have some notion of why they want to so that you can help them find that value and you want to give yourself permission to move on once they've found the value they do not need to comprehensively understand your software if they have a question later they can follow up later you want to just focus on keeping them excited and finding that momentum for your deal so let's assume you're having a great discovery call and at the end of it you said what difference would that make for you and they said oh my gosh that would change everything this year it would mean I could twice as much done on half the time and then you say I would really like to show you right now if you have time and they'll either say yes or no to that so if it's yes let's dive in okay if I understood you right the most valuable thing go ahead make a prediction is going to be x let's start there if you're not sure be a little more open and it let's log in which of those menu items shimmers at you where do you want to go and let them choose and then what's interesting about that one well I'm looking to see x and y oh cool let me show you this or what do you see as naturally solving that problem for you you can have some fun with it there's no one way to do it other than you're letting them follow their curiosity and you're occasionally feeling them with a puzzle piece a card whatever you want to say to help them keep progressing their discovery of value but then you're often checking in with them how did that go so the starting point of the conversation is really just getting into whatever does that you're going to demo and then either asking them what they want to look at what shimmers or going straight to the thing that's going to provide the most value and saying I think this is going to provide the most value to you here it is this is how it works this is what people experience from it what do you want to see here so if somebody said to me the main thing that I want to see is can your product beat our current Shopify integration of x I'm going to say what would it be like to beat that and they'll say it would have to do this in this say great let me show you that in that and I go straight to that part of my product and I show them that in that now I ask them how did that go what do you think compared to your current Shopify plugin does this do better like you had hoped those kinds of questions if they're good what else do you want to see today that's my next question so you always end up in this like what else what else they can discover if they want to they can say well show me what that tab is show me how users work I want to see how billing goes let them guide the story you check in on value again and again and again how valuable is that what difference would that make for you how do you see this compared to other product experiences you've seen that are like this what do you think what do you think your team will think those are the questions of a demo okay I'm really good as I have a going it's going great I am living the dream and I really love helping parents get confident about kids and from this so can we start with what brought you to this holiday yeah for sure obviously bringing up kids in today's world is is bloody scary there's you know Amelia of influences mostly negatives that are trying to corrupt them for lack of them or nuanced take and we there's this and theme in our relationship now with my my kid about social media they want to phone their friends their phones they don't have one I'm very hesitant and yeah that's essentially it I'm a bit concerned as to what are going next but I take a guess actually I've looked at here what your concerns are about what we're going yeah I obviously get that they have to be engaged with the digital landscape that's out there and I think my concerns are mainly centered around dopamine that's that's pretty much the main one I think that it's unnatural unhealthy based on my value system for humans to be sitting there feeding themselves tiny amounts of dopamine all day every day I'm familiar with the the studies on rats where they kill themselves to get more dopamine because food loses its appeal and unfortunately I see the majority of my adult relationships where humans would rather continue using Instagram porn sugar etc alcohol because it's easy and I know how malleable kids are and that if you get the hooked on this drug young about how easy it is to sit there and press about and then like you're so feel temporarily good I'm worried about the cognitive pathways that's going to establish for them about what good looks like moving forward and building a healthy chip with happiness etc. I don't want to make you invent technology here that's what I've got and done but if you could just blank canvas imagine a phone that did not open the door to triggering all that dopamine or using that as leverage could you just like do you just describe it what do you think would it would do yeah I mean nice I can stop by very practically showing you my phone the fact that that's that's my home screen so I love a black and white aesthetic I love keeping things nice and minimal notifications are obviously a massive one a friend of mine from parenting group Nick Fitz wrote a paper about batching notifications so I think software is crucial right you don't want to be having the phone buzz 247 you don't want it to be offering apps that are easy to just indulge in for lack of a better term I mean I could go on but those are some of the key pieces something that's grounded in the behavioral science I guess is building healthy habits wonderful we've built the phone that's grounded in the healthy habits behavioral science and I built it with a therapist council including authors of tech generation some of the biggest experts on teens and kids and neural development as well as technology and I think it's the phone that you don't know you've been looking for could I show you some of it please okay I'm going to share my screen and we're going to have to imagine some of the kid phone because I don't have it in my hand okay what about two parts to this phone and the key first part is that there is a parent's portal to manage the phone from your phone they don't have to ask the child to hand their phone to you check it or do things with it it's actually controlled from your phone separately and it's own app which looks just like this desktop software I'm showing you you can do it from either of those I'd love you to pick one of the topics on the left here that jumps out at you and shimmers at you and let's start there nice I do like shimmering let's go with apps sweet here's what the apps are built on it has a philosophy behind it and it's one that we back parents with which is phones are tools not toys we draw hard line and boundary on this phone any app that's on here is a tool now there's a lot of cool tools that kids need and want to learn whether that's athletics related music money measuring things calculating just learning tracking their period all kinds of things what are some of your kids top interests yeah they like all these video games at the moment to be honest I know they're a little about them that's the most of what they're interested in unfortunately we have no games on here so they're not gonna like that in as a parent with your interest for your child's natural skills, bentor abilities what do you see more creative musical athletic they they like problem-solving logic you know those those kind of things using a brain exploring puzzles I guess cool let's take a look at some of the reading and listening apps that we have them here so there are a few that have to do with providing content but you'll find there's nothing on here that's gonna be like a proxy game puzzle we don't believe in the intersection of gamification and learning when it's on a phone I think it's great in a classroom or in other contexts but when it's on a phone it just still has that effect of drawing you in and if that phone is living on your body you always have this little suck on your attention this little potential of dopamine hits and we're trying to make a phone that's completely you're of that how does that sound to you to go to be true yeah we've worked hard to curate the apps that kid needs as they grow but here's the best part on day one guess how many apps are on their phone zero zero you as the parent are the only one with access to the app store they don't get to go get it research it ask you for this or that they have no idea what is even available until you tell them or show them now you can decide if you want to walk through this with them but it's not like they're sitting there with a catalog that they can do them scroll and look for and be interested in and ask about you progressively give them apps one at a time as they're ready to learn and use that out as they grow how are you handling the the hardware side of things like a really intelligent kids just have do whatever they want so no we actually went deeper than anybody else has and we created a software hardware combination so it is on a professional Samsung smartphone they won't be embarrassed about it but we have ungoogleed about 60 of the 180 micro services that constitute being Android and made her own version and they can't hack it or get around it. Cool so yeah continue that sounds good. Some of these apps out there we give warnings about because they might have a hyperlink that goes somewhere and we've disabled all internet browsing occasionally one of these apps will have something like mature content or whatever and so our curators provide some notes around what might violate your guidelines on an app that is generally great but may have some work around or standards that it doesn't fit for you so you as the parent are always in charge of deciding which apps go and don't and we inform you when anything's close to the gray area. Now here's the better part. The apps only show when you want them to you mentioned batching and I'd never heard of it until yesterday but I have to imagine that the idea of a phone going into different modes through the day where perhaps it goes into a get ready for school mode after nothing mode all night and in that mode it allows certain audio apps but at school it shuts things down and doesn't allow you to talk to other communicate with anyone but when you're done with school perhaps all your notifications come in from any messages you did receive. Is that what bathroom is? As Saint St. Ignis that's above and beyond. Interesting. Yeah that's very impressive. The last area that I'd like to make sure you understand at a high level before we have more discussion is I'd like to talk to you about how it calls and texts people. We worked really hard to make it be a safe list only device meaning no incoming calls and no incoming texts from contacts that are not approved by you. Your child can meet someone and submit for review a contact but you still have to approve them and when you approve them it can get pretty complicated if you want it to where you can approve them to different lists like friends or emergency contacts that are available at different times of day. So you can create a if you want your child to text certain friends or learn what it's like to text friends a guideline that there's a two hour period of the day that is the only time texting is allowed but with emergency contacts such a parent's texting is always allowed. In addition to that you get a full text history where you're able to see both of their call history who they've been calling and exactly what they've been texting back and forth and you can disable or enable images in that texting. So you have the ability to guide your child as they learn the skill of texting and as you see all kinds of funny things like my daughter which he first started she got in the lab that her grandma didn't respond within five minutes and she texted her her very first text room was like yay I got grandma and she texted her like five or seven times within two or three minutes and that was awesome because it opened my eyes to aha she has to learn expectations around texting and that has been a long road with her. This gave me the tool to help manage that. Yeah just just cutting in if I want to switch this off so that if they get to a certain age certain stage where I don't want to be able to see their texts is that possible it is possible. So we have multiple areas of the phone that can be graduated and I'm not going to click this button in the account that I'm in because I'm not in a demo account I just literally logged into mine but as you go through the workflow here you can graduate to where you're managing just the contact list and now they're managing just the contact list okay they can manage this category about okay they can manage all the hours okay they can manage all the contact they can have complete privacy of communication. We'll never allow games social media or ads onto this device but outside of that you can slowly turn over maximum control to your child. Amazing as I I'll be honest you essentially sold me it's a very impressive pitch my wife just texted me that she's at Whole Foods and needs me to race over there. I've got about five, six, seven minutes left can you run me through the pricing side of things and what this looks like practically? I'm definitely very interested for sure what do you imagine something like this cross pricing wise? I mean I'm benchmarking it off a standard phone and I'm thinking that you know most companies in this country ask me to put like zero down and then you pay what 50, 60 a month for a phone line and that comes with a free phone but then you know like Verizon if you have four lines it's like a hundred bucks for four lines so I sort of you know if I was expecting a top end phone four lines for a hundred bucks a month maybe a little bit for the phone I don't know roughly around there. What's it worth to you to have confidence that your child is having a dopamine three growth experience? It's a good question. I definitely be down to pay more than that if it starts becoming more than a top-end iPhone that starts to see questionable to me as to why it needs to be that amount but I guess I'm open to a range of pricing. Cool. There are three factors to pricing. The first factors the phone itself and we sell three models. There's a base model, there's a high-end larger model and a ruggedized model especially for those boys who end up throwing their phones from 15 foot trees and things. The second part of the pricing model is the monthly plan for the carrier. You still have to have an arrangement with a third-party carrier. I tend to recommend a $15 a month plan with T-Mobile pre-paid or with MIT Mobile depending on which one is best in your area. And then finally the actual management of the software, the portal that we just walked through, we continually update, maintain and add the apps and for that it's $15 a month for that service forever. If you have additional kids sign up it's only $5 for the next. That pricing seems incredibly fair to me. I like the fact that the phones are one-off and then obviously subscription to the other two that sort of industry norm these days. Yeah, look, I guess I want to check with my wife. She makes all the big decisions around here and then get back to you. How can I help that? It's successful. I mean, she's probably going to want to say something about what we talked about today. If you had a short video, something that I could share to her. I do. I have a great video. I actually have three videos. It's too much. One of them is a longer video about 20 minutes with a therapist reviewing our phone. One of them is this good morning America segment and then one of them is really just one of us, my team sort of walking it through. I'm wondering what's going to give you the best chance of success here because I don't want to cause conflict between you two. Yeah, I appreciate it. The 20 minute therapist one sounds great to me. Okay, I'm going to get back to you immediately. Would you like that in a text or an email? A text would be lovely. Thanks for offering. Done. My last question for you will be, how should I follow up with you as you're making this decision? Yeah, that's fair. Let's touch base in a week's time, also. If that works for you? Sure. I'll send you a video of me talking to you in about a week. Right there at the same number on your text. Is that cool? Yeah, that sounds great today. Awesome. Benji, what else can I help you with today? That's that's about it. That sounds great today. Well good luck with your wife. I hope you get a dopamine hit from how well it goes. I'll do my best. Thanks so much. Chaps. That was great night. Congratulations. Thank you so for doing a yellow laser on this. Let's talk about gatekeeper conversations. So in order to get through the gatekeeper, you have to show respect for their decision-making process and respect for the gatekeeper's role. If they trust that you will listen to them about what is and isn't a valuable use of their executive's time, they will give you breadcrumbs or stepping stones that you can follow to get through the gatekeeper to the decision maker. Sometimes the gatekeeper's job is to present things to the decision maker and sometimes the gatekeeper will bring you to the decision maker. I've seen things where there might be a special meeting that reviews for decision-making once a month, or once a quarter or something like that and the gatekeeper will package things to be considered in that meeting and occasionally if you have earned the right amount of trust with the gatekeeper, which includes a way of being that they know you won't come and pitch but you might ask some questions and answer some questions. They will actually invite you to those meetings to speak. Most people are kept outside and they're going to have to provide materials that the gatekeeper represents but sometimes if you play this right, you get invited. So let me show you how to play this. This is co-developed with Stephen Tomlinson and it's a strategy board just for discovering their decision-making process and you can enter this at any point in a conversation of discovery, or negotiation and sometimes as it's own call. So when you have discovered enough value, sometimes they'll say, well this will never sail by committee or this person will have to get involved and then you're already on the process discovery. Often, however, they don't volunteer that information and you have to ask it. So one of our favorite questions to recommend is who else needs to be involved? Once your prospect has had that aha moment of, yeah this is promising, then you can ask who else needs to be involved. They will tell you. Just leave that question silent though for a minute because sometimes you especially the more corporate you end up with in your prospect, those folks think of themselves as influential and then when they're asked this question, recognize the three or four other people that need to be involved. Now you ask what do those people care about? Well, we care about this that keep stay there. How do they make decisions? What's been the more priority for them? And you'll hear things like, well, it has to fit with our existing initiative. Okay, what are those initiatives? Or we are always worried about costs or we like exciting things or we need to invest in AI. Who knows? Okay, so then when you've got that figured out, you're thinking, yeah, we have that. I know how to speak to that person or I know what I would say to that person but now I have to get the formatting right. How do they like to receive information? And sometimes your prospect won't really know what you're saying and say you throw out some suggestions. We can demo and show up to meetings. We can answer questions. We can powerpoint. We can video. How do they like to get information that they really make decisions on? Oh, well, they like to build the relationship themselves. Cool. How do they like to do that? How do they get started? Oh, they need to see studies. Okay, what kinds of studies? So we're going to follow up a little bit and really figure out how that person receives information to make decisions. Then we're going to offer that exact information or presence or appointment or whatever it is. Sometimes they'll say, this person, this decision maker, listens to what this other person says. So what do you think we do? What we go back to the beginning? That person. Tell me about that person. What does that person care about? What does that person like to see in order to present to higher ups and get executive attention? And then that's going to be what we offer and we have two gatekeepers. We have the gatekeepers gatekeepers, right? So we're going through the process in any which way. And then we offer that. I'll have that by this afternoon. I'll have that by tomorrow. I'll send you the calendar link. I will book an appointment. Whatever it is, then we can ask for follow-up. So let's take a look at a real example. This is from a medical device company and it has to do with selling into a hospital, some pretty advanced technology. So here we prepped the person through this process. Now I want to make a key point, which is I don't have a lot of examples with words down here for this process because by and large, once you have the process, it's very natural. So just follow it. You don't really need to prep the process. But sometimes you might have a meeting just with the gatekeeper. That was like really hard to get. And you need to really prep before it. So in this case, it was like that. So we have a good example. Who looks across the entire system for this kind of technology and this kind of result? Oh, well, that's going to be this person, this person, who else is involved in decision making? Well, also the VP of supply chain. Great. What goes into their decisions on this industry information, on this exact precise thing that we're working with? Well, they haven't made a lot of decisions. Okay. What do you imagine they're going to or this is how they make those decisions? We actually have a value analysis model that we use. Oh, sweet. Is that a spreadsheet? Can I see it? Those are some different ways this can go. Okay. How do they like to get that info? Well, we end up preparing the value analysis model for them and we'll usually have five or ten different products and product categories that we focus on each time the value analysis committee meets. Great. How can I make you a great formatting this value analysis model? Would it help if I tinkered that with you? I can produce that. Whatever. You can like really get into it to it or you might feel confident at this point that the gatekeeper is really going to represent you. So then you make your offer. I'll send you the value analysis model filled out tomorrow. I recently had one where the how they decide around software project was it's just the executive. This gatekeeper knows the executive likes to see it and then they're going to test with two or three hard questions and the other 25 questions that you think are relevant. They're not going to ask if it first three answers makes sense. They're going to assume it's good. I said, okay great. So I'm going to send you a mock up of just the best screens and it quick you to answer those hard questions unless you'd like me to be there to help you. I think I would like you there to help me. Great. I'll be in the meeting. Just for that purpose. Right. So we're making the offer that is custom tailored to this gatekeeper and then we ask for that follow up. Can we check in next on Friday tomorrow in a month? Whatever it is, get it on the calendar. That's your always have action item next step. Kind of thing and that's the end. That is how we get through gatekeepers. So let's talk about how we did this with next sport. Next sport was a complicated sale because it was to school boards in school boards bought this kind of thing by the board actually voting on it. But that means the superintendent had actually put it on the agenda which means the assistant superintendent and people who had minister the software had to actually want it enough for the superintendent to want enough to talk to the board about it. So there's a lot of moving pieces in a fair amount of gatekeepers involved with the superintendent both being an executive and a gatekeeper. So that's why it's a model is we would enter through different means and there would be different gatekeepers. So sometimes you can just meet these people because you met them at a conference or whatever but we would even call sometimes and start at the secretary. Hey secretary, we've got something that will save your supers a lot of time and make them look great to the board. How do we tell you about it? And we'll have this long conversation. So to be clear if we're going direct to the gatekeeper as our first call we're not starting with process discovery. Process discovery happens after we already believe there's promise of value. So we're actually starting back here on the discovery wheel with the secretary. What kinds of things are you all doing this year to save time and improve efficiency at your school? Secretaries will talk to us about that and we go through the whole thing what difference would it make if I'm not going to review that the point is that we have to establish value before it makes any sense to discover their decision making process. There will be no energy in it. It'll be like if somebody picked up a cold call and the other end of the phone said, are you the decision making purchaser for this and that kind of thing? I'd be like click because we haven't earned the trust necessary to have that conversation. It is an important conversation but you're always going to have to start with value before people have follow on conversations around other topics necessary to make a deal. Once we're there secretaries like yeah that sounds pretty good. Who needs to see this next? Well I think the assistant superintendent uses this person to evaluate things like this. Great. What do they care about when they're looking at things like this? Well they want to know that it's highly usable and that it's very affordable. Super. How do they like to discover that? How do they decide that it's super usable and affordable? Well they're going to have to click on the software and give it a try. Okay sounds like a demo but I'm still in how are they more likely to want to get their hands on it in a live environment or just see a video of somebody else using it? Oh no they need to touch it. Great. Now I'm going to offer. Let's set up a demo with them. I promise it will be fast and I will be very quiet when needed. When can we do that? Okay I can pull up their calendar and do this or you can send some hesitancy they're like I don't know if I'm no problem. What's holding you back or what other way would you like to make sure they get their hands on this? Okay I think it would be best like this. Great. That's the offer. So that was a pretty reliable path for us though was that a secretary could open the door to the next person up and get us a demo. Then from there we have to keep going up the chain. So we have a demo. When we do the demo guess where we're starting? All the way back in discovery because it's a new person. We can start with here's what we thought your secretary thought might be valuable here but we want to check back in with you but your objectives for this year around governance and school boards and this and that. Okay here's what we have to show you is this thing. This is the part we think is going to be most exciting to you. Let's go look. We do the demo whatever. Assistant super yeah this isn't super tendon is excited she goes yes this is something that we want to look in further. Okay who needs to see it next? Superintendent. Okay what does she care about? Well and we do the same thing. Once we're done with the superintendent we're going to go through just go over we're going to go through demo like whatever it takes to build the case with this thinking deal. Okay who do we need to take this two next? Oh I have to get purchased decisions like this approved by the board. Super. What do they care about? And we're going through the process again. So you might do this a lot of times just remember while we're learning this as its own model it's it's connected to the nature of their business and all the previous discovery conversations and you may have to restart or discover your conversation each and every time. Let's work through a completely different gatekeeper conversation. Towny was a really interesting product because it was a buy bank give local app think of it like yelp but only local locally owned businesses are on there. And for us to succeed we had to pick a city like wakeo Texas you know a tier two city and get vendors enrolled on there get banks enrolled on there and get consumers enrolled on there. So there were a lot of gatekeeper conversations with those first two especially the businesses the merchants. So these are food truck companies, local crafts and trades people, coffee houses and event centers those sorts of things. So usually to have a conversation with the owner you're going to have to get through a gatekeeper. And so we'd come in and say you know we have a way to drive more consumers to you because you're a local business. What difference would that make to you? And they start talking and we end up right on the discovery wheel but that's usually like a five six minute conversation discovery wheel because pretty obvious every business wants more customers. So then we have who needs to decide whether you try out being listed on our app where consumers discover you. Oh that'll be the boss. Cool. What is the boss care about? See the mistake that I think some people make in that moment is they pounce. They're like they're sensing that this is pretty obvious no brainer and they go straight forward and I talk to the boss right now. Which is probably possible. But what we want to do is partner with the gatekeeper because the gatekeeper's going to help us. What are the boss care about? Oh this and that. How does the boss use technology? She hates it. Okay. How do you think we can best position this so that we can drive those customers to you without it feeling like a massive headache? Oh this and that. So following the process all the way through with Tony really helped gain adoption of the owner who by and large was too busy and they're their local merchant. They aren't working behind a computer. This stuff intimidates them most of the time. So that was kind of how that worked out. Whereas with the bank we had to do full on B to B business sales. We're going to the bank. This is probably call or email or introduction to get started. Somebody mid level at the bank. Hey this kind of thing is going to help connect consumers to local businesses and drive cash back rewards and PR for your bank. Now we get strict to the gatekeeper. We've done the value conversation. Who else at your bank needs to be involved to decide to get involved in our app? Our local app business scheme thing. Oh well that's a committee decision. Okay. What do they care about? I'm going through the same thing. So the point is that this model is the right psychology of understanding how a place or a person makes a decision and it's infinitely flexible and scalable. You might have to use it a lot of times. So it's another one that I've committed to memory at this point is I'm always discovering people's decision making processes. Theoretically you could use this anywhere. You know so parent is coming to your school for a tour. Well who else is going to decide whether your could go to school here? Oh my partner. What will they care about? They're just about the sports. How do they like to get information about that? And it's going to be the same thing. Your deals fall apart when there are more decision makers than the person you're talking to and you don't go through this process. So it's great wanting to commit to memory. There is a classic gatekeeper that you're going to encounter called the MBA. That's the associate at a venture capital firm. They are the gatekeepers of what deals getting front of the VC investment committee. Usually the partners. So I've dealt with tons of these. And what I found is they will talk to you. And it's actually one of the best things you can do to learn about your startup without causing tons of doubt from the actual partners is just talk to the MBA and say what's it take? What's it take to get through the door? Well this and this and this and this and this and this. They'll usually tell you they'll send you financial models. They'll talk about deals that haven't worked like they'll really talk because they enjoy it and their job kind of sucks. Like it really does because most of the time they are viewed as an object by people who want something from their boss. And that's just not a this is a grind. It's not very fun. So when they get a conversation that is really engaging and somebody treats them like they're interesting and stuff that can be that can be enjoyable to them. What you want to find out is what do the partners care about? Where are they at in their fun stage? How do you best present what the deals that do get funded? How often are they from the MBA analyst versus introductions and the MBA analyst? What else do you need to do to build the case for them? And by and large they'll tell you and you're going to usually find some surprising stuff on how to get to that BC and what that BC cares about. What trigger words they do and don't care about. Do they invest alongside other people? Are they usually a lead? Are they usually a follower? All that stuff I mean is literally the gatekeepers job in adventure capital studio to equip you with that and help you disqualify yourself before you waste somebody else's time. So I've always found them to be quite open and they will help you build your startup up and sell it. I remember that one MBA at a Austin BC that I respect a lot. He worked with me for a solid 18 months on a startup I was working on before saying we're ready to go to the partner. He was willing to make that introduction the entire time. But I wanted to make it to a point where he's like, no, this is rock solid. Yeah, this is one of the best we've ever seen and then he opened that door and that's exactly what happened. We went in and the BC partner was like, this is one of the best presentations and discussions I've ever had and I just thanked the MBA for helping us and it was pretty cool. Do you treat those like disc circles? Like they're going to be in the end. I always treat my first interactions with VCs as discovery calls especially the MBA. What I'm discovering, however, is it's kind of hard to bifurcate your brain a little bit. You're used to selling your startups product or service, the value of it. But in the VC world, you're selling an asset. So it's completely different animal. So you're doing discovery around what kinds of assets are they qualifying? What's their approach to that? What kind of results are they getting? How is their fund thesis doing that kind of stuff? So it's the exact same thing, exact same value discovery. We'll just the definition of value is usually market size of this competitive edge of that team of this traction of that in a certain industry. Those are the things you can find out, objective, approach all of it. The normal discovery will process from the gatekeeper as you're getting started and so yeah, you're on discovery loop all the time. I imagine the law funders have not called like certain. Yeah. So I did about 50. That's not true. I did at least 30 venture capital or investor calls last year and quite a few of them were with the gatekeeper or the NBA. And I always start with asking about their fund and I know that most founders come in there and just pitch and that's usually the feedback that I'm given is thank you for being a professional. You seem like a really executive blah blah blah and that's because I am. I know that I'm coming to the table not as a lesser inferior speaking to a superior but they have something I want and I have something they want, a great company that's well managed. So this is a mutual exchange of value, not something that I'm coming to the table as a beggar like oh my gosh let me just desperately pitch my startup hoping you give me money. So that rewiring of mentality to me is one of the most important things that a founder can do in the fundraising process see my fundraising course. And so I'm always starting the conversation with what's your fund really about? What are you really looking for? What's your thought on this market space that we're in you know AI legal tech, EdTech, whatever and they'll tell you we're skeptical about this we're bullish on that this is what we need to see. My conversations almost always go down that road and they end up talking to me for 10 or 15 minutes about their fund and pitching me on their fund before I open my mouth and then once I open my mouth I know exactly where to go. So I don't I don't pitch in those moments I don't think on any of those 30-ish calls or meetings that I had did I ever walk through my slide deck. Instead I'm using discovery and then my slide deck is just like the demo that we talked about. It's random access memory. So I say I have every slide you'd expect because I do. I have it all. I have competitors I've got three year performer I've got the deal that I'm asking for team you know all of it. So I ask them what do you really want to see? What's the number one criteria you use when making this decision? Well at this stage pre-seed we are team first versus you know at seed stage we've got to see the unity economics. Whatever they say boom let's go there just like the demo and I will find myself progressing through the various stages of investment calls without ever walking through my whole deck. But showing different pieces to different people so the deck just like your product is random access memory for the person on the other end to discover. I think the scariest moment of a startup for founders is actually asking for money crafting or deal and that's where a negotiation comes into play as you're moving forward in your deal cycle. You also use these exact same tactics when dealing with a renewal and upsell an angry customer, a contract change. So the tools that I'm equipping you with right at this second is how you can prepare for any heart conversation where you have a direction that you want to go and there's a really fun way to make it easy to talk about money because in this style of negotiation we are helping the customer or the prospect find value and fuel their own energy into the process. We are not going to go out on the dance floor, invite our partner and start twirling around and doing stuff as if we have a partner we're going to ask our partner to come to the dance floor with us and we're want your dance together until they get off the wall and come join us we're not going to move further down. Let's look at some negotiations. I control B&B needed help with one of her upcoming negotiations where she's trying to change a client who is paying ad hoc for their tax and accounting product and service to change to a monthly service agreement. So we can see that the objective here is to say yes to a monthly service agreement. That's the goal. Now we have to find our generous intent for the customer. Why is this good for the customer? This piece right here is the magic of negotiation because when you have in your heart a generosity towards them you know they don't see it yet but that's the goal of the conversation. What's in it for them that there is something in it for them to say yes to the objective that you have in mind. This gives you the starting words to your conversation and every time the conversation goes off the rails or even if they're angry or frustrated or say they just don't see it as long as you can check back to know this intention that I have for them if they could only see it this really is good for them. It gives you a recentering place where you know you're not taking advantage of them and you know this is good for them and say you can still say things like you know I really still think this is going to be good for you. That's a grounded and centered place to be and it's a way of authentically engaging with what's best for them that shines through and builds trust and feels comfortable. So we have to ask ourselves what is that intention and write it down and here we got to to establish the relationship that we already learn she needed during the sales process she being a client. This is the right relationship for her. That's our generous intention. We're going to establish the real relationship we know you need because of how we understood you during the sales process. Now let me show you how to use the other parts of the board. We're going to anticipate the concerns and challenges that our prospect has. Now you have to know just like with the cards there may be an anticipated concerns or challenges. You're going to handle them exactly the same way. Here we're trying to make sure we're ready for and likely are right if we've listened well to the prospect. The concerns and challenges they have and what's maybe challenging to understand and I need to break the mold from how most people think a negotiation goes is this is far more questions and prompts driven than answers driven. So we're not going to hear them say an objection and then answer the objection and then they say another objection and we answer the objection. That feels a lot more like conflict and fight. Instead, we are going to every time they object with a concern or a challenge, hand them the puzzle piece they're missing for them to on their own see that that concern or challenge goes away. That's where the magic is so they are much like in the demo discovering the value themselves and they're actually walking towards your generous intention and discovering they really should do this. That's what this whole thing is about. So as a founder, I think the hardest part is attaching your ego meaning your emotion from this thing that you're selling or negotiating about being you to instead you're on the side. So let's go back to Star Wars. Your Yoda and you're trying to convince Luke that Luke needs to use this lightsaber right. So you are not the lightsaber. You're just convincing Luke that he needs one. So you are not your product. You're convincing your client or helping them see that your product would help them. With that detachment, you're going to be far more effective at this. So here's how it works. You list their concerns and challenges and they sort of go in a flow actually. So this concern and challenge you address like this, the next one like that and so on. So hitting the deadline as a concern and challenge, then we come up with what they must understand or believe to get to yes over that objection. They need to understand on hitting the deadline that our deadline is aggressive that we as a company can't commit without a long-term commitment, such as a monthly services agreement. This is how they get their deadlines met is by engaging with us in the way our company meets deadlines and by the way communications or everything. This is this is what they need to understand and believe to know that we can meet their concern and hit the deadline. But what we're not going to do is dump that on them. That's a bunch of answers. We need to know the answers, but these are the answers that they need to discover. And so then we move to the prompts. And this is where the magic happens. The prompts are our puzzle pieces. Our question or our statement that we hand to them to help them make this discovery of what they must understand or believe. So here we say how close are you to projecting these payouts. That's what came up as a great prompt to help them get in deadline thinking mode and discover how aggressive they are because she was I believe in this example. She was three to five weeks out from some serious deadlines. We have this question. What's at stake on this deadline? This helps her understand the impact and think about her the impact of missing the deadline. Well, we don't know what she's going to say, but we have a pretty clear idea that she is going to get to even more understanding of its aggressive and it matters a lot. And then how do you want to be updated while we dig through your books? That's how we get to this communications or everything is we're going to actually ask the client how they want to be updated. One of my favorite types of prompts is a prompt where you ask about past good relationships they've had, especially when a prospect is concerned about the quality of a relationship they've often been burned before and we want to ask them about a good one. What have you loved about a vendor you've worked with and how they communicate with you? And that puts them in the mind space of instead of complaining actually planning and helping you know what it'll take to succeed. So this isn't comprehensive, but it gets the conversation really going for your prospect to discover this value. These prompts are the same things as cards. You can even cross that word out prompts and think cards. Cards prompts same thing. This is how you take a turn. Sometimes it's a statement. In this example, these are all questions, but sometimes we might say we've found the best way to hit deadlines is to turn over all your books to our team at the very beginning and just let us do our magic. We've found something. That's a great prompt to help them make this discovery. Okay, down here we had a different objection. She thinks she can do it and that she has is a nine out of ten at the skill. She's just busy. That's her concern. So we have to prompt her with how are you going to let go to our team. Give in your expertise. That will help her arrive at the understanding and belief here of recognizing. She can't help very much. The reason she's looking to an outside vendor is not lack of skill, it's lack of time. But she's got to be the one to get there to put energy behind this objective. Let's Tonga is a hospitality industry software company that is building a QR code that replaces concierge. So someone arrives at a high end hotel, scan a QR code, and here are all the experiences that that hotel already has lined up for tonight tomorrow nearby. Help to figure out what to do and features the partners and even internal services of that hotel as a business. So there was a big discussion that the founder of Let's Tonga had to have or got to have with one of the largest financial transaction brokers in that industry. So this is negotiating a channel partnership, one of the best ways to intern industry. If the channel partnership succeeds, then what's at stake for Let's Tonga is they go from no distribution and walking the streets kind of marketing and selling to massive distribution with a partner who already has thousands of customers that are the same target customers that Let's Tonga has. So this is a pretty common scenario for a founder to be in is to try and negotiate one of their first channel partnerships. So the yes here is to identify the short list of first case studies or trial users for this kind of partnership. That was what we came to creatively as this is a really good ask to have this channel partner test out the relationship. This is a channel partner instead of going system wide, we'll select five or six hotels as the first case studies and pick the ones that are going to be most friendly and easy to work with to test out this channel partnership. That's because Let's Tonga believes that with those first ones we'll knock their socks off and want to go system wide and it'll be easier and better to negotiate that deal because the value will have been clear. It's a really good strategy. So we've got to find a generous intention here. How does this work for that partner? And we came up with this one. Help enter the one click concierge trend. The software company in question powers all kinds of transactions for this industry. Think of it kind of like one of those banks like Mercury or something where they start adding more value to founders by pulling in different partnerships and integrations like free Amazon credits or quick book discount for six months. Those kinds of things. It's like that. Let's Tonga is looking to play as the one click concierge partner that keeps you can now offer all of its clients. By doing so, it gets to enter the trend of hotels saying who are looking for one click concierge, they can see as the value provider of that. So I hope you can see that's like really working hard at figuring out what's in it for this vendor and it's to be perceived as a trend leader, trendsetter and value provider to all of its customers. That's worth a lot of loyalty and ongoing business. So now we have to look at the concerns and challenges. We're not going to go through all of these. These are just some examples and we can look at everything from a big concern is going to be how do we structure a deal like this? Let's Tonga's new. There's no case study. There's no past example of a channel partnership like this working and so we have to figure it out. What the client needs to understand and believe here, the channel partner needs to understand and believe is that distribution is needed that there could be some percentage fee for without doing any work other than communicating. And that let's Tonga is willing to go exclusive and be provider of one-click concierge and not competitors provider of one-click concierge. This is similar to when the iPhone launched and they had a one-year or two-year contract with AT&T for that to be the only phone company that could resell iPhone. So this is against your that if can understand and believe this, they'll know how to structure it better in a way that works for the partnership and is more trustful from the get-go that lets Tonga's not trying to take advantage of. So here are the prompts we came up with to help make discoveries around structure. What kind of results would get attention inside of it? At the end of the day, the integration program is not even run by one of the highest level executives at. So we have to be asking this person how they're going to get recognition and reward by making a decision like this. What results are going to get attention? And what's going on right now for delighting existing customers versus selling them more stuff? The reason we love that question is because this is a chance for to not be perceived as coming up with new stuff for their customers to buy, but instead coming up with a value on value add-on, delighter for their customers to have. That's where we think one of the unique angles is. Because it was magic about this. We're not pitching that. We're not even taking the risk. We're not saying you need to provide more delight factors instead of things for your end customers to buy at which we might get a response like that's not doesn't matter for us. Instead we're keeping it curious and letting them put the energy into it. What's going on right now for how you all are doing that? We could go either way. The prospect may say, yeah, it sucks. We are just selling and we're perceived as trying to just get more pieces of the pie or they might say, oh we've got a whole initiative on that. We're doing this and this and this and this and this okay. Well then that's not a very promising place for us to pitch to, but do you see how we didn't pitch? Instead we questioned and found where's the energy and we might move to something else. Let's take a look at one more just to see it work through. So how about build versus buy versus partner? This is always something that a big company is thinking about when they're thinking about partnering with a small tech company. It's like, well, could we just hire our own team and build that exact thing instead of partnering with you or might we buy another solution or even you? So we have to come up with what they would have to understand and believe to overcome that concern and it's pretty simple that you'd have to build a team with new competencies to make that happen from scratch and we have those competencies. So doesn't make sense. So our prompt questions here is how would the nature of your business have to change to support this? I hope you could see that that automatically is a fantastic complicating question. If they're now thinking, oh dang we probably have to have a billing system, a tech system, a new skew system. We would have to build sales collateral, marketing collateral, and actually build a stinking product. That sounds like a lot of work. We're trying to help them discover that, but at the same time we're open to what if they already do have all that stuff figured out and they already are going that direction. Then maybe it doesn't sound that big. So we might also ask them, how are you thinking about competitors pursuing one click, concierge? Where's your mind at and one click concierge? And they might say, let's just come on our radar or yeah, we've really been looking for something or we're trying to figure out what our answer is to that. We don't know, but the answer to that is going to help us find energy on how to think about this objection of building buying versus partner. Now let's take a look at a company run by one of my best friends and former CEO's Z Suite tech. This is the actual negotiation board where we were testing out how to build these negotiation board. So it looks a little different but just got the same, same concept as the one we were just working on. And this is what they used to prepare for their negotiation for their first major deal with a multi-billion dollar bank. So this is where a lot of founders are going to find themselves. It is your first big one. Oh, we want to spend some time practicing and building a great strategy for it. So here's the objective on this one was we really want to find a reason for that big customer to move on this now. We need a sense of urgency. So they had been talking and talking and talking for months and the point of this conversation that we got to as the objective is they need to move now. So let's start with the concerns and challenges. Why wouldn't they? Well, because they need executive communications for executive committee approval because they got a bunch of other projects going on and because of budget. What you can see here on the iPad is I've pulled over from previous discovery work. What is the problem statement? They're really strong on the problem statement as the basis for this meeting. So you can see one of my breakdowns of problem statement is obstacle, urgency and benefit altogether. So the problem statement here is that the bank is lacking product technology to pass on to their clients and must show momentum to customers because they're losing faith in this bank. The benefit to them is low cost deposits, new commercial clients and greater speed to market. So that's altogether from the results of discovery conversations. We get to build on that as we negotiate towards the subjective. So how are we going to answer those concerns and challenges or help the prospect discover it? We think that for them to get this executive committee approval, the executive committee needs to believe that our solution helps them be more competitive faster. Do you see how that's got the speed element to it and the value component to it? It's both speed and value, more competitive faster. So our prompt here is about the executive committee. How do they make timely decisions? That's going to be the key unlock with our prospect here. How does this executive committee make timely decisions? Certainly they do sometimes. They finally end up making up their mind. What factors drive that? As we start doing that, we're going to find ways to hand our prospect information, cards, puzzle pieces, whatever, to help them recognize this and get to this understanding and belief that they'll be more competitive faster enough for that committee to make a timely decision here. So one of the things we did was we prepared this insight, this card to play, which now we would just consider another prompt. That one of the best case studies, leader bank had this massive increase in deposits and uptick in new loans and a 50% cut in a certain kind of cost as a result of using our product. So here's our case study. Those kinds of results we want to imagine. We want the prospect to imagine happening and getting the attention of the executive committee. So our first prompt might be how do they make timely decisions? We might have some follow-up questions or discussion there, but then we might say, well, we found at leader bank that we were rapidly able to drive this much increase in business and a 50% decrease in these kinds of costs. What's your executive committee going to think about those sorts of results? That's a prompt. Hopefully they say, well, shoot, that would make us more competitive faster. They might say something similar like that. Those are the discoveries, that's how we facilitate them making discovery. Let's take this other objection because it's really common. It's like, well, we're busy. We've got other projects. Busy is very common, but it's actually one of the most easy to overcome because by and large, your answer is always the same when you're a startup, which is you're going to white-clove, do things that don't scale, just make it happen and it's going to be so easy on them, and you're going to fly there and do whatever you have to if that's what it takes. So that's kind of what it means to be a founder. Like, if you have to walk an envelope from their office down to the bank, you're going to fly up there to Boston and do it. So the understand and belief is they need to understand that your company solves this active pain and will immediately do it. All the efforts on you, they don't have to do squat other than answer a few questions. That's what they have to discover. So you might ask questions like, well, who's supportive there so far? And questions that are not here, like, what, let me come up with a few on their fly. What other projects are we competing against for attention? And if we take on 90% of the effort, what do you think is still the critical parts of transition that only you can do? They're going to start imagining, well, I guess I'd have to do this. I guess I have to do that. And then you can start pitching at them and you could say, well, what if we took on this aspect of that? Or you can hit them with an actual piece of data or case, like, with this bank, we actually did that piece of the problem. How does that sound? So one at a time we're working through their other projects concerns to help them get to the understanding and belief they need in order for you to keep moving. I think the last piece here that I love to highlight you can see how we've found this one understanding and belief item on z suite will drive low cost deposits now. That's really powerful for our objective of move on this now, but it's because we understand the corporate mindset of our in prospect, which is if they can do something that has like quarter by quarter results, everybody's going to feel good. They're going to get promotions and raises and not have the pressure of those quarterly results not looking well. It's always good. So we just can have a very simple prompt. This is one of the simplest prompts in the world to me. What seems promising here? That gets the prospect in benefit mode. And when they're in benefit mode, like, well, this is what it seems like. Then we can play with them and work with them to help them increase their energy around that benefit to where they actually want to do the minimal work required to have that benefit. So what seems promising here is a great prompt to build on. And when they say this, then we can say how about in time? What happens when those results that seem promising get here a lot faster? What kind of difference would that make for you? They're like, well, this much. Well, we've seen actually much higher than that kind of revenue results. So I guess it would be more like that much. And like, well, that sounds great. I don't believe you. Okay. What would it take to change that belief? I think you should give us a shot. Well, I guess this in this. Cool. How can I make that little risk for you to say S2? Those are the kinds of interactions that we have with these prompts. So the actual close that happens through the negotiation. Let's talk about the start and the end. One of the best ways to start these conversations is with your generous intention. So here on this one from a deal that I closed that was a really, really big deal, I started with the generous intention. I started with an executive who is very serious, ex-military 30 years experience and maintains one of the largest relationships that his Fortune 500 company has with the largest medical health system in the world. He never has much time and, you know, serious, high stakes. And so we get on the phone. I don't check chat. You're safe. Hey, Mac. I want to find the ways that elevated conversations are going to impact your business line and your team. He's like, okay, tell me about it. Okay. Well, the objective that I have for us today is I'm going to lead with my intention first and I have objective second. And the objective is I want to get you on a monthly services agreement. I want to get you on a contract. I want to price and lock in this deal, whatever it is. Okay. Now, towards the end of the conversation. When the prospect is locking in on the understanding and belief necessary to say yes, you are now working towards the close, which is the objective that you had. And you just return back to it. What's going to take for us to finalize this deal today? And then you start talking about your price from your terms. And you do it the same exact way. So if price in terms are going to be a big objection, you have a price in terms of conversation, using prompts. And you say things like, what impact is this going to make on you bottom line? How do you see that value playing out versus the costs? We price it like this. Then they say, well, that's too expensive. Okay. Now we get to go to all the ways to play. Are you going to make concessions? Are you going to understand why it's expensive? Are you going to understand the cost benefit analysis? That kind of thing. And so you end up probably seeing something like, how do you all think about acceptable cost given the amount of benefit that you've just articulated? And I was going to help them discover that it's probably a reasonable deal. And you usually don't have to compromise if you figured out where the value is. So you need to go back to what we started this whole founders and sales topic on, which is if you already are convinced of the value and you know where it is, just hold to it. They have to see the value. So you keep refocusing on benefit. If you don't know, then this is discovery time. Okay. What about the terms don't quite work for you? And you can even be super vulnerable. We really thought it should be priced like this because, well, first of all, our cost model is like that. But can you give us advice here? We believe that the benefit is this and so that should make total sense to do a deal like that. Why isn't that working for you? And if you've got a disarming tone about that and are genuinely curious, what's awesome is you'll even activate their advice giving brain, which means they're trying to make this work for you. And so you can even say things like, well, let's imagine that I was talking to someone else when we were competitors. What would you tell me about this? As I'm hitting this particular objection and you can trigger their advice. So I don't know exactly how to tell you exactly what to do. But I do know that as you move towards close, you're always returning to the objective and depending on the stage of your maturity of understanding what value is, you're either going to hold really solidly to that objective and just keep using these same tactics of prompting. Why aren't they there yet? Prompting they're understanding and belief to break through those problems. Or you're going to end out finding that the terms and conditions don't work for you. That you can't build a valuable business on it. And that's okay. That's an okay thing that is really happening in a negotiation is it has to work for both of you. So is my goal on an negotiation to get a yes? What yes it is. However, I'm very likely to hit the gatekeeper drama. Especially if I'm doing fortune 2000 type stuff, I'm also very likely to have to prepare to go through supply chain and procurement. So usually there, most of my discovery and negotiation at first is around value and does the business want to do this kind of thing. And then they actually have professionals who's job is to negotiate me down on price and line out of the heck out of me and the person that I have been talking to the whole time does even participate in those conversations. That's his own animal and we treat it the same exact way. So a lot of my negotiation boards here actually are with supply chain and supply chain officers. They have their own thing. And there's a full set of price objections and things that happen there. But the point is that you're yes of your objective needs to be germane to something that that person can say yes to. Sometimes that's introduced me to the committee. Move this to supply chain. Get a contract in place or sign a contract. Just yesterday, I called my client who has been on the fence about signing a deal for some time and has gotten there and he's like, yeah, I'm really excited. Let's do this. I said, okay, may I send an invoice to you tonight that you will pay tomorrow? That's what's that's what's going to get us started. And he said, oh, what do you have a contract with that? You better do. It's a simple contract that covers these things. Oh, you know, I think just an invoice will do. Okay, cool. So I can send it for this amount. Oh, you know what? You need to send that to my controller. Set his controller's name and contact information. Okay, when I send that to the controller, should I say you've already approved it? No. What's it going to take for you to approve this? And then he told me. And then we did it right then and there. And that could. And then I did and I sent the invoice on. So those types of conversations at the very end of the clothes are very unpredictable. But if you've established value, all you're doing is questioning how does it work? What's their process? You want it to be this way? Oh, that doesn't work. How will it work? When will they do that? What will they need? And you're just kind of staying there with the client walking them through the end of the decision making process. Let's talk a little bit about the overlap between discovery, demo, and negotiations. There is a lot of overlap. In our final segment, we're going to really cover the ways of being which work across all of them. The key is that you're going through the stages of sales flow, which is, well, first somebody has to actually believe there's value. Second, they have to actually see that there's value. And then third, they have to figure out the terms conditions, timing, communication, rhythms, all that stuff. That's usually what negotiation is about. Of how they're going to receive that value. That can happen compressed. You can go boom, boom, boom, boom. Really fast. It can happen where some of the information for that was handled via email or your website or different exchanges, which probably shouldn't happen that much in earliest stage because you want to figure out what those websites and emails should say by doing it manually at first. But point is, it can be fueled by any number of things. It can require any number of people on the other end. And sometimes you get stuck on the gatekeeper, which is its own drama. But again, sometimes you can beat that down that same day. When you have something that people really want, like heavy product market fit, they'll sometimes get the person on the phone right then. I've had that happen several times. Sometimes they can't. They're too busy, whatever. So the length of time is unpredictable. You have to go through all these motions, but don't be closed to the idea that you could get it all done in one conversation. In order for you to do this, first you have to understand this and follow the models, like I've been teaching you. But second, you have to follow three rules of engagement. These were recently published in a medical journal as having measurable impact on decreasing anxiety and improving well-being among people who had these conversations. My mentor developed these and published in that medical journal. We've used these across industries across conversation types. Everything from executive presence to sales conversations to calling meals on wheels recipients who are known to have depression or anxiety symptoms to dating advice. These rules of engagement work to build trust and progress relationships in natural ways. Here they are. The ROEs. There are three. First, one point per turn. Steven likes to say that one point is a conversation. Two points is a speech and three points is a sermon. When you're on a sales conversation, nobody wants to hit three points because their brain spins in different directions on each point that you're landing. So if you're three slides deep and I had thoughts about slide one, those thoughts are at tension with my ability to listen to you on a slide three. That's why you don't see me pitching. It's because to me, I am going to start the conversation within the first 60 to 90 seconds to say this is where I think the direction we're heading, what's shimmers to you, what's interesting to you, what do you want to start with, where do you want to go? And I won't be directing their attention. I will be supplying energy to their attention, where it's already going. So I only make one point per turn. By the way, this is hard. And that's why it's more caught than taught. And the bulk of this section is role play with founders and sales team members. So you can see in action, oh, it's hard to see at first and you have to spin practice to increase your awareness that you're not doing one point per turn in these conversations and how to do that. For example, multiple points within the single sentence that has a clause can be violations of the rule. Like for example, you might say something like our software has already produced a lot of value for clients just like yours and we're trying to make features like this work for your industry. That's two points, not one. It takes a lot of restraint and comfort with one particular word to be good at this. That word is silence. Steven likes to say silence is what trust sounds like. I showed up to an executive board room once. Me versus two other people who all had very different plans for how to build a company and this is the person who funds and owns the incubation mothership that incubated that company. They both walked through slides. This person was notorious for being on their phone and distracted during meetings like this. I instead talked for about 25 seconds. I said, I believe I have the plan that is going to cost the least resources and lead to market dominance by this date. What are you most interested in here and it was really weird because everybody else in their room froze. I stared at the guy. There was a long awkward silence. He put his phone down and he said, what? So what does that show you? He wasn't listening in the first place. Me walking through slides isn't going to land anywhere and when I communicate, I want to land. I asked him the question again. I said, what would you like to see first? He goes, I guess whatever you think should be first. I think it should be this. How does that sound? He had to say sounds great. We won the pitch big time because I was the only person you really listened to. And that's because I forced his attention. That sounds maybe horrible but it's actually not. Why would I speak when somebody's not giving attention? And if they don't want to give attention, that's their choice but I don't have to give my voice either. So silence creates. I have found in these moments when people are used to being pitched at, used to being sold to, they're used to sitting there and multitasking on your webinar. If you force engagement by making one point and then using silence, they're either going to lean in or they're going to go away. Most of the time they lean in because they're like, oh, this is fine. I actually get to be engaged for a hot minute and I have to pay attention. This is interesting. It's like chess. It's puzzly. Which is why we play a game called executive chess sometimes to practice this. You get infinite prep time between points and then you make your point and then the other person gets infinite prep time before they respond in a single sentence and what's wild is when we do this with teams. The people playing always say, oh my gosh, that was an eternity and the people watching are always like actually that felt like a normal conversation. Nobody was pushing anybody. That's kind of cool. And you start to feel this rhythm that reduces anxiety and honors the other person's choice to go this way or that way and then you're going to meet them there and keep playing. The second rule of engagement is to follow the clues. We're especially looking for hot words. In the negotiation book they talk about the concept of mirroring. So the safest thing to do if you're not really sure you just know that the last sentence they said had something key in it is to take the very last word that they said in their sentence and say that same word with a question mark on it. So you're talking to a client. Let me take a legal tech client and they say, yeah, we really hate working with our court reporters because the transcripts and that whole process is just full of delays and we're always waiting and I just am frustrated by the whole thing. The whole thing? Yeah, the whole thing blah blah blah. They're like whatever was the last thing. They just said it. They told you the door that they want you to open. And if you'll just ask about it, they're going to skip a lot of steps in your sales process by and large when you follow the energy that they have. So listen for words like frustrated, angry, upset. We're really upset with our current vendor for this. What's upsetting about that? That's following the clue. So we want to be paying attention to the actual sentences they're saying and choosing something from that if it's clue where they and following it instead of going down our agenda, I promise you it will skip many steps in your own agenda and move towards the decision that they need to make a lot faster and you'll also not have this problem of the dangerous trigger to thought that has them emotionally thinking a certain way and you're saying other stuff and they've still got that keeping them from following hearing you. It's an amazing thing. You can practice this. I actually as a extreme introvert used this practice when Steve and Tomlinson first taught it to me six or seven years ago. He's like, we'll just start with everyday life. Somebody reaches into their purse at the airport. You say, what are you looking for? If somebody has a tattoo, what's that about? Because the interesting thing is people are giving off clues all the time and it costs you nothing to notice and ask about it. And it costs them nothing to say, I don't want to talk about it. Not interested, nah, whatever. Nobody was harmed. Usually they're in the ill engage and it doesn't cost you to do that. So I've become actually really good at normal conversation with people by looking for a clue and then engaging with it. Third, open questions and prompts. Most of us intend to open questions but we ask closed questions. When we're with our friends, we're all loose and natural. We sort of tend to answer the questions behind the question. When it's intense, our brains work a different way and we tend to be more literal about whatever question was just asked or whatever statement. So we have to avoid close-ended questions that start with is, would, could, is it okay if X? Would you like me to show Y? These are like binary answers. They are yes, no questions. We want to move to like or scales. We want to be degrees in between and so we have open questions which start with what, how, why, and so on. We also can prompt with a statement. We've found with all of these, you insert one point because you're following one point per turn and you do it. So how do you all make decisions like this? How do you see this industry going? What was your experience with the last vendor? Those are open questions that leave room for story. Have you ever had a vendor you didn't like? Yes. Is price important to you? Yes. How important is price to you? Well, it's the number one thing because there's a huge cost cutting initiative. Boom, there's a story. Let's follow the clue. What's driving that initiative? Well, last year we were in the red and we've had a bunch of layoffs so we're cutting costs everywhere. Everywhere? Yeah. My friends got laid off. This and that happened. Supply chain is being maniacal. We have to cut costs everywhere. Okay. How important is driving revenue if you have to increase costs a little but get a lot of revenue from it? Oh, well, that would be okay. Nice. I found the chink in the armor. Right. So that's how these questions and prompts work. Is the more we open them, the more stories they tell and the more clues we can follow and move along. So every single thing we've learned so far, this is how to execute it in a way of being that's going to increase trust, increase connection, decrease anxiety, feel good to them, feel good to you, have them telling the story that's real and having you connecting with their actual needs. That is magic when it comes to being influential and closing deals. There are a couple key points to the framework that I think you need to understand well in order to see which really going on here and start adopting the habits around a way of being that will really work for you. Why you're going to love this is because it takes the idea of sales out of transaction world and moves it into strategic relationship world, meaning on going interactions of ever increasing value based on trust without the achy stuff that makes us mostly not like sales. So it's got a well-being twist to it which was why I love teaching it to founders because this model is very achievable, authentic and natural everywhere we've implemented it. Let's start with trust. Trust can be thought of as a deepening line. We always say we have more depth or deeper trust. How do you get there? Well on one side of the line is you and on the other side of the line is them. Trust is the level of depth you're willing to go together. That's your level of trust. It takes time to build different levels of trust. How do you do it? You make small exchanges at shallow levels of depth. You're basically butt sniffing to test whether you want to take a successive deeper risk with them. That can look like hey my name is Isaiah. I have a startup where we're helping people make breakthroughs in their AI technology. What's your name? Hi I'm Mindy. I make AI tech breakthroughs. Wow imagine that. What's one year proud of? Oh last year I made a Da Vinci AI model work similar to chat GPT three months before they released. I didn't even know they were working on that. That's cool. I'm a huge chat GPT doctor. What do you think is one of the most promising implementations of AI that you've touched so far? Oh I'm a huge fan of and we're deepening our conversation. Here's what keeps it from deepening. If when I say something to you, you speak for 15 minutes. Then I don't want to ask a follow up question. Not because I dislike you necessarily, but because I don't trust you to answer the question simply and straightforwardly. I don't like to do business with people like that. I don't have time for it. How we're responding to each other as well as what we're responding are both aspects to trust. Now watch this. This is called a Pounce. Tell me about your kids in your marriage. We barely know each other professionally and you want to know about my kids in my marriage. That's a risk that's too far for me. Have you got the budget authority necessary to XYZ by my product? You know any billionaires that you can introduce me to to raise funds? Would you be willing to open your roll-of-decks right now and help me have the things that I need? Do you, I saw you know this and that person unlinked in? Would you be willing to introduce me to them? These are all over steps of the relationship that is built so far. But what I want you to notice is they're not over steps if you've done the work for that risk to be appropriate. I can't give you a list of rules for what constitutes the correct level of depth to do that. But I can tell you that that's the work that you have to do. As you need to make it back and forth exchanges, passing the mic back and forth is one of the most important exchanges that you can possibly make because it teaches them what you're like. And here's what they're looking for, the three gates of trust. Curiosity, empathy, and incitfulness. Critical point. They have a specific order to them. Curiosity, empathy, and insight. Particularly insight. A lot of people share their idea, their knowledge, their product, whatever upfront. Here, I made this, you need it. Here's what I think you should do. You may be insightful, and you may be right that that's what they should do. But if you haven't earned their trust by being curious and empathetic, their guard is up and it's going to bounce off their forehead. In order to earn the right to deliver something insightful, which takes energy from them. Here's something else you should do. You're doing it wrong. I have a thing that you do not have. E goes involved. Lots involved. We have to first go through the gates of curiosity and empathy, which mean that they believe you're a kind of way. You're a listen. And they believe you get them. If you've done that, now you have enough trust to be able to occasionally say something insightful. Like, well, what I think you really need is X. They'll totally listen if you've done that work. So that's why some of our early exchanges on this trust line are focused on establishing that you're a listener and that you know what it's like to be them or can see through their eyes if you don't. Earning the right to build trust. Now, how's that relate to the discovery wheel? Well, the discovery wheel is a model specifically designed to enable you in exact order to deepen trust. Now it's a circle. So it sort of like let's let's unroll the circle on this line. If this was a straight line instead, the milestones going deep on trust are that you know what their objective is, which the way you're curious and the way you reflect and ask the next right question show your curiosity and your empathy that builds trust. You don't say your empathic, it's just be empathic by the way. A lot of salespeople adopt a very negative habit of repeating back the thing that they just heard. Oh, so I hear you have an initiative to do X, Y, Z this year. No, that's really bad advice. That's parroting or pandering in a real relationship like out of bar with a friend, regular communication. We don't every time somebody says, hey, I would like to go play a game night tomorrow at this thing. Oh, I hear that you would like to play a game night tomorrow at this thing. Can I come? We just say, can I come? Or what time? People who are paying attention and dancing together? The next move that they make naturally is the right next move to make. And that demonstrates that you heard them and understand them. So you don't have to say you heard them and I understand them, prove it by advancing the conversation. And that's why the discovery wheel and processed discovery flows that we just learned are so powerful is they prove in the exact order that you're advancing the conversation the right way. So you objective approach like that, completing the discovery wheel. These pass us through the gates to where at impact at the end of the discovery wheel. You have shown them what you're going to be like, which is curious. And you're able to land a problem statement that sounds even smarter than they would say their own problem and they say that's right, which proves empathy. At that moment, they're ready for your insightfulness. Well, we found a way to deal with that and make it happen. No kidding. Tell it to me. Now they're curious. That's how trust is going to work.

Here is my first prompt:
